Delish. We tried the veggie wontons with sesame dressing.  The sesame dressing was so good, I loved it.  I could put that stuff on everything. For the entree, I got the veggie duck.  It wasn't what I was expecting - I was expecting more like chunks of mock duck like what you get at a lot of Thai restaurants when you order mock duck. This was a big piece of fake duck, the whole size of the platter.  Certainly plenty for two people.  The duck is not the mock duck Thai places use, which comes from a can, but is actually made at Garden Fresh using pressed shitake mushrooms and tofu skin.  Pretty awesome. While I thoroughly enjoyed the duck, I had a taste of a friend's cashew chicken, and man - that was good stuff.  I'm glad I tried the duck, but I'd go with cashew chicken next time. Reasonable prices for fresh, delicious food.
I had been wanting to try a vegetarian/vegan restaurant for some time, but my carnivore of a boyfriend just wasn't down. So when my vegetarian coworker suggested this nearby spot, I jumped at the opportunity. Chinese food is a smart way to go if you're trying vegetarian/vegan for the first time. After all, there are a lot of delicious sauces and flavors, and let's face it..a lot of it is fried. General rule of thumb - anything fried is going to be tasty. Meat or no meat! We ordered the scallion pancakes and they were delicious. I ordered the crispy chicken with brown rice and veggies and the chicken tasted just like...chicken! Yay, success! My coworker ordered beef of some sort and the texture was off. It didn't taste like beef but more like...tofu skins. I really enjoyed my dish, though, and would go back again for lunch. And I'm determined to get my boyfriend to try this place...wish me luck.
We ordered a large meal for a work event. If no one had mentioned the food was from a vegan Chinese restaurant, I don't think I would have noticed (well, minus the beef dish)! Props especially to the chicken dish. * Black Pepper Veggie Chicken - 4 stars Good sweet/sour flavor, the 'chicken' had a thick crunchy breading and was the most realistic 'meat' we had. This was definitely a popular dish. * Veggie Chicken Chow Mein - 3 stars Fine, nothing crazy special, but nothing to complain about either. Your standard veggie lo mein noodle. * Orange Veggie Beef - 3 stars I wasn't sure if the broccoli was meant to be decorative or was actually part of the dish - it was barely cooked and practically raw. The beef itself was very dry and hard, I thought of it as almost a beef jerky texture. This was the big vegan giveaway dish. * Hunan Tofu - 3.5 stars Nice - a good solid dish. The sauce was rich in flavor, and the tofu cubes had a just-right texture. * Sauteed Vegetables - 3 stars Like the Lo Mein, also fine but nothing special.
First, the food here is delicious. There are a ton of options, and everything we had tasted fantastic. The moo shoo vegetables were particularly tasty, as was the carrot cake we had for dessert. Next time, I want to try the vegetarian mock salmon. I bet it'll be great! Second, this place feels like home. My wife and I spoke with the owner (Alice), who is perhaps the warmest person I've met in Palo Alto. She welcomed us into her restaurant as a family welcomes one into their home. She and Paul (the chef) were kind and generous, and we left feeling like we'd just been on vacation at a bed and breakfast. Thank you Alice for a great meal and a wonderful experience! I recommend Garden Fresh to anyone and everyone.
I really really wanted to love this place. I had read about it at least 2 months beforehand and had been planning a visit since it seemed pretty unique and had great reviews. For the record, I am a pescatarian but I do enjoy eating at vegan restaurants. I can see that the family running the place is super friendly, but the food was just not good. We ordered the scallion pancakes, but they were simply fried, crispy dough. I've had scallion pancakes before and normally this was not the texture they come in. They were ok, but more sauce or some kind of dipping sauce would have been helpful. We went ahead and ordered the black mushrooms + bok choy, and orange chicken. The mushrooms and bok choy tasted fresh, but there was no flavor in the dish - just very bland. It seemed like they just sauteed them lightly in a pan and that was it. The orange chicken was very orange-y (not necessarily a bad thing) but it tasted too citrusy for me and was very chewy. Overall, I was pretty disappointed - I love the idea of the place but the flavors just weren't there.
I am all for vegetarian\vegan food, I have tried several places, mostly in SF. Garden fresh is ok compared to other I've tried. ( side note: my favorite is golden era , best I ever had ) Ordered the black pepper chicken $10 ( the sauce was a bit too salty and some pieces were rather hard) the veggie potstickers $6.95 were a bit soggy and not very tasty. My highlight is the brown rice $3.3 !! Not many restaurants know how to cook  brown rice, garden fresh made it tasty, fluffy, yummmmm . Added an extra star just for this ! The lychee Ice tea $2.95 was tasty too! Not overly sweet but good ice tea with a hint of lychee. It's a nice place overall and the prices were decent. Would recommend.
This is my all time favorite vegetarian restaurant! I think the food in the Mountain View location is a little better but the ambiance here is better. Recommendations: Definitely try the basil tempura! Try the curry flavored rice noodles Sweet and sour pork is amazing
If you are looking for a great vegetarian/vegan place, this place has really good food. The only down side is that their tap water tastes a little funny so you might want to pay for an actual drink.
This little vegan restaurant is a nice addition to Palo Alto, but the dish I had on my first visit was lackluster. The brown rice was good, but the veggie beef and broccoli dish lacked flavor. The pieces of veggie beef and the sauce were bland. The dining room was clean and neat. Service was good but not great. When I was done eating, the bill arrived seconds later without a word spoken to me. The variety of dishes offered on the menu is impressive, and I'll eat here again. But there's room for improvement with both the service and the food.
I really, really liked this place. the food is delicious, and for the non vegetarian, the meatless chicken, pork or beef tastes the same as "the real" ones. My only concern is that they've charged us too much, and when I asked for the bill, to compare the prices with the menu, it was all written in Chinese symbols. Anyway, great place to eat healthy but, just a tip, mentally, do the math of what it costs each dish.
The owner remembers me every time I walk in. And when I order takeout but forget to call ahead, she'll often give me a little soup while I wait! And do I need to mention how great the food is? Let me explain: you know how you want to really love Sweet and Sour Chicken/Pork or General Tso's, but can't shake the feeling that the meat inside costs less than your soda? WORRY NOT! Eat with reckless abandon, as every bite is delicious and guilt-free, even for meatitarians. And it's a great date spot, and I utilize it so frequently, the owner always asks me which one is my girlfriend (sometimes in front of them!!) Yeah, she's awesome. TIP: The lunch specials are a DAMN fine deal: entree + brown rice for under $10
I absolutely love this place. The owner, Alice, previously owned a vegetarian cuisine on the corner of my childhood home on Holly Street called "Fon Yong Vegetarian Restaurant." My family grew up eating her delicious food. In my book, she does everything right in terms of GOOD and flavorful Asian food. She cared for our family, always asking how so and so was, how we were doing in school etc. and so many people loved her. I was sad to see Fon Yong closed down because they were struggling with their residency. The restaurant was sold and it wasn't the same without Alice. Several years later I was introduced to this restaurant as being incredibly delicious, and vegetarian, which is not common in the peninsula. When I arrived, I saw Alice, and i was simply shocked because i thought she was gone. A lot of her dishes taste just like she used to make them, and even better. To say her food is delicious would be an understatement. Get the lemon chicken, her chow mein, or chow fun,  is really really good, no one has ever made it like hers. Scallion Pancakes with Carrot Sticks yum yum yum!! VEGGIE BUNDLES  were to die for, If you go to the mountain view location the green boat is really good as well. Did I mention I'm not vegetarian? :) this place will turn you into one.
I'm no vegan by any means, but since I'm a foodie I decided to try this place! This was also my first time ever going to a Chinese Vegan place, so my opinions are not compared to other Vegan restaurants... Just on my pref to the way food should taste. The Sauteed Assorted Vegetables were really fresh tasting and since this item already had broccoli in it, for The Veggie Beef With Broccoli I was able to substitute the broc for chopped asparagus:) The beef was a weird texture, and it didn't really taste so much like beef, it was a skeptical taste that I don't think I could get use to. Wasn't that impressed with the beef. I also got the Singapore-style rice noodles, and THIS WAS MY FAV!!! Little yellow angel hair noodles, it's light, not really any sauce in it, but really good, and you don't get the uuuhhhh my tummy hurts from eating too much carbs feeling...Nope nope, just a light little noodle dish that everyone won't be disappointed they tried. The grilled Veggie Salmon is wrapped in seaweed, the sauce they used with this dish makes you want to dot the i in NAILED! I almost tricked my brain into thinking I was eating real salmon. For those who are scared that salmon is fishy maybe one shall take the plunge and try this first step to the real thing, no fishy taste here, more like a salmon burger. I usually eat white rice, but The Stir-Fried Green Pepper Rice wasn't bad at all. Overall, after eating this meal, I felt good, proud and healthy and want to say thanks Veganarians... Now I can try other Vegan spots and have a Garden Fresh to compare others to.
Food was really good, but... a bit pricey. I suppose that's because it is in downtown Palo Alto.
This place is SO good!!! Seriously, I dream about this food. Cute little place with really great service (the owners are so sweet and attentive), and great food. Love, love, love the General's chicken, and the chicken chow mein. Even my husband (who is by no means a vegan) loves this place!
This review is from December...sorry, I really need to finish my reviews in a more timely manner... I've never had vegan Chinese food before, so I wasn't sure what to expect. It was all quite tasty. Walnut prawns, sweet and sour pork and orange chicken. Hot and sour soup. I guess it's impressive that it all tastes like actual shrimp, chicken and pork, but honestly I'd rather spend half as much for the real thing. Because yes this place was crazy expensive and not huge portions. Service was mediocre. Felt like the waiters were staring at us. We were obviously done (for a while) yet had to ask for the check even though they were staring at us. I don't get why my husband loves this place so much.  We're not vegan!  Just go get the real thing!
Vegans rejoice for (Veggie) Duck! And the remade classic, Orange "Chicken"! It's gotta be magic how they're able to deceivingly turn sheets of tofu into something that tastes like duck! Although it could never compare to real duck, it's as close as it'll ever get to satiating your duck craving on the Vegan diet. The best part of eating duck is the crispy skin but sadly this soft skin Veggie Duck comes drenched in faux duck sauce. But still delish nonetheless and a one-of-a-kind must-try! The Orange Chicken was also amazing!! It definitely beats Panda Express and gives any self respecting Chinese restaurant a run for its money. I highly recommend getting the Orange Chicken. It's worth your tastebuds. Mmm...
Awesome. I've been looking for a west coast analogue to my favorite NY restaurant like this, Zen Palate, and have been let down every time. Until now. Awesome, awesome mock dishes, delicious scallion pancakes too. Much better than some of the other places I've been to like Enjoy Vegetarian in SF and Lovin' Hut (the one in Palo Alto has a vastly different menu to the one in SF near UCSF). A tiny place, I could see that being an issue for groups and waiting for a table. Staff is really friendly. I will definitely be back.
I wanted so badly to love this place!  I'd been planning a visit for a couple months after seeing great reviews here on yelp.  We went on a Friday night around 7:30 which was bound to be crowded, especially in downtown Palo Alto.  I'm not a fan of loud, crowded restaurants in general.  We were seated in the middle of the crowded restaurant which meant the waiters and customers all had to walk past us...we had to make sure our purses here held in our laps and arms were closely to our sides since people were bumping us.  Annoying.  We felt rushed and really just wanted to get out of there. Food was okay, I felt the busy atmosphere took away from the food since I don't remember it much.  Great that it's all vegetarian, but I don't think I'll return.
In case this was not clear to you THERE IS NO MEAT IN THIS RESTAURANT. Some people claim their stuff tastes just like meat but as a near carnivore, it does not (I had to go to devour some fast food chicken sandwiches afterwards as I ate very little here). The atmosphere and service was friendly and my omnivore friends seem to have enjoyed their dishes meals however. I'm giving this place 4 stars since that's what it has right now. Therefore I won't move its rating as I don't think a vegan restaurant should be faulted for me disliking virtually all non-meat dishes. But thought I should warn unsuspecting patrons: THERE IS NO MEAT IN THIS RESTAURANT.
So the menu here is definitely smaller at lunchtime.  But that's cool-- the lunch specials are a great size, run about $8, and come with rice! (but no free soup) The spring rolls are delicious-- basically vegetarian egg rolls, really.  And I love egg rolls.  It's a very good thing I can't make them myself. The Japanese eggplant dish is also a definite standout... I've gotten it more than once and had no regrets. Only bite after bite of pure bliss. We didn't finish all of our brown rice, and the owner/manager wouldn't take our plates away until we did... Which was cute, in a mom-ish sort of way!  But we were too full and had to disappoint her.  Ah, well, you can only make 'em proud for so long. Tasty place in Palo Alto, classier digs than Mountain View, really a radically different feel.  I might stick with my Mountain View location for the strip mall charm, the convenience... and the low-pressure on the rice-finishing front!  But if I'm in Palo Alto, I'd head back here in a vegan chicken heartbeat.
After a 3 mile run at The Dish, this place was perfect for lunch! My boyfriend and I ordered three dishes: Spinach Wonton Soup, Walnut Prawns, and the veggie ribs. All very scrumptious! We even got a free bowl of corn and tofu soup! Spinach Wonton Soup: it has been years since I had wonton soup and this hit the spot for me! The wonton was full of "meat" and the soup very flavorful. Walnut Prawns: WOW! I am allergic to shellfish, so this dish was heaven for me. The "prawns" were dipped in a thin batter, not too heavy with the perfect mixture of veganise. The walnuts.. delicious, crunchy, and sweet! I would definitely, always order this dish when I come here. Veggie Ribs: This was my boyfriend's pick and he LOVED it (for a meat eater). I am just amazed on how they got the mushroom texture to taste, feel, and look exactly like ribs. The black bean sauce complimented the "ribs" very well.. every bite was tender! The staff was also very friendly. It seems like a family owned restaurant. I will be coming here whenever I am in town. It's a perfect meal before grabbing Sprinkles Cupcakes ;)
I was really looking forward to eating at Garden Fresh after not being able to go for some time. I ordered everything I usually order to go (generals chicken, tofu delight, noodles) and everything looked delicious, but was incredibily  bland as if they forgot to add any salt which was a huge disappointment! I had to add a bunch of soy sauce which helped. I really like this restaurant so I'm hoping this was just a one time mistake.
This place is amazing! I've been coming to Garden Fresh for many years. I first came when I was... Read more 
I'm vegetarian with preferred vegan foods.  I'm always looking and hoping for a Really Great Meal being the foodie that I am.  Although this sweet little place is not in the league of Millennium in San Francisco, it does have very good food. Fresh, sauces are flavorful, I never worry about whether there is any MSG.  The 'meats' are very tasty and perfectly cooked, from the faux salmond to the crispy fried General Tsao's to the faux beef in the braised green beans. It's a mom and pop place, their 2nd (-- the first is a much more casual atmosphere in ...Mountain View??).  The lady greets everyone with genuine warmth and she has the memory of an elephant.  She's even stopped and sat down with us at our table to chat like old friends.
Garden Fresh is awesome, even for meat eaters. I ordered the spicy eggplant and was in heaven.  The food is freshly made, flavorful, and utterly delicious. Super friendly waiters too! My only complaint is that they don't do to-go orders very well. The package them in those fold-over to-go boxes, so the sauce spills all over the place and makes a mess.
I had a great time at Garden Fresh tonight with a vegetarian friend. The place is definitely cute and cozy -- perfect for catching up and enjoying the company you're with. I'm not a vegetarian or vegan myself, but I have an affinity towards tofu and veggies. I do personally like to steer clear of faux meat products though, which Garden Fresh offers in abundance. The menu was a bit overwhelming, so when it came time to order, I told the waiter I was interested in a tofu dish, and he was very helpful steering me towards his choice, the Hunan tofu. I was a little worried about the spiciness, but he said it would be no problem to make it mild. Perfect! My friend ordered the kung pao "chicken," also mild. It was so refreshing that they were able to tone down the spiciness for us weaklings. We also got a side of brown rice, and we were all set! The Hunan tofu came in a sizzling pot, which was an impressive presentation to say the least! A little hysterical too, to be honest, because the sizzling made the tofu jiggle like jello... heh. Hey, it's the small things in life! I ate every last bit of it and not only did I love the juicy tofu texture which was just perfect, but I also felt like the sauce and veggies went really well together flavor-wise. All in all a very good dish. My friend also really liked her veggie chicken, though my one bite of it reminded me of how unlike real meat this stuff is. Not an issue for vegetarians & vegans though! She didn't mind at all! FYI: They only take one credit card per party -- no splitting the bill on 2 or more cards.
Really great start, big friendly greeting. It is late and I am tired so I am taking it to go. I ask for a recommendation and after a short targetted interview, I was given 3 choices, all with promises of no sugar and little or no oil since this week I'm going to eat healthy. So I chose the....tempura (made from 2soy and not breaded) and requested...brown rice and a side of broccoli steamed. My new mom said it was too much food. I convinced her that I will share it. She conceded and let me order my broccoli. The food is ready in about 5 minutes and I grabbed my card to pay. She asks for cash. Huh? Ok so I pay with cash. She hands me my food and a quick tip: "keep it up with no sugar or oil." ok Mom. I couldn't hold back a chuckle. She also gave me a quick tip for my next visit (after asking with whom I'm sharing, how long I'm in town, where I'm staying, and what I had for lunch, etc) along with a meal recommendation and a reminder to....you guessed it, keep out the sugar and oil. At this point, the food would have to taste like rocks to ruin this. It didn't, of course...right amount of spice and good texture. Very nice experience. The small container of steamed broccoli, however, cost me $8. Ouch. Food was great. Service was funny (good).
Being a vegetarian, I'm pretty restricted sometimes when going out to eat, so it's so nice to go into a restaurant where I can pick from any item on the list. I had the veggie bundles, Mongolian "beef," and hot and sour soup. All were delicious and well prepared. I especially loved the veggie bundles-their soy "ham" combined with the shiitake mushroom really stood out. I'll have to come back for the scallion pancakes everyone keeps talking about.
I've never had vegan food before.  That being said this place is amazing. Great tasting, fresh food.
I can only remember one other time I got up and walked out of a restaurant due to insulting service (or lack thereof).  The first time, it was Gordon Bierch in downtown San Jose.  and this time?  Garden Fresh on Ramona in Palo Alto. yes, I had eaten there once before and remembered how impressed I was with the food.  Excellent flavors and it is surprising that it's completely vegan.  For the food I give 4 solid stars. Last Sunday, Zak & I wanted to get a few things in our stomachs before heading to Stanford for the afternoon.  We were going to bring some things to my family too, so were expecting to get some entrees to go.  We entered the restaurant and there were only a couple tables currently full.  We asked for a table for 2 and the server motioned for us to choose a seat. We sat down by the window and looked over the menus.  Remembering what we loved last time and agreeing on several other things we planned on taking with us to go (after devouring the scallion pancakes we planned on getting just for us) - we eagerly waited to order. and waited... We watched him bus a table and serve hot food to the people at the table next to us.  The entire time we sat there with our Menus closed (that is a sign you are waiting to order in most places) and smiling towards the man working... Nothing. He seated a family of 5 at the other table next to us... We lifted our hands motioning to him... Nope.  He didn't see us???? Then a man came in and sat down by the door. The server then came over and took the order from the family of 5 next to us.  I said to Zak "So.... THEY get their order taken before WE DO???!!!" To which Zak replied " I'm sure he will take our order next and then make sure the kitchen serves them in the proper order" in an attempt to calm me down. Mind you... this restaurant is small... The server HAD TO SEE us as well as HEAR that we were ready to order.  AWKWARD!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! He took their order then walked directly over to the guy who had JUST COME IN & took HIS ORDER?!  OMG! and yes, I said it out loud "OH MY GOD - is this really happening?" Zak asked me if I'd like to leave and I jumped up, grabbed my coat, and said "YES, PUH-LEASE!" That was so rude.  read my other reviews - We are smiley and nice people... We did NOT deserve that treatment.  at all.  Won't go back.  Very rude.
Went back tonight. As good as ever. But a note: the Mountain View location is a bit cheaper, but seems to have a slightly different menu. But a plus: they have awesome lunch specials, where you order one of their entrees and it comes with a spring roll, soup, and rice, for $7.95. Now I want to go at lunch.
I was sooooo skeptical about vegan food. Especially vegan Chinese food. But I was told by another... Read more 
3.5  growing on me.  difficult to enjoy vegan style, and sometimes you just get a lot of oily fried stuff.  since someone else ordered, was able to appreciate the dishes: pepper chicken -- really close in texture.  the orange beef was interesting, mushroom pressed with some kind of corn outer crispyness.  it's interesting to try to figure out how they do something, other than the classic meat substitute or tofu dishes.  scallion cake was tasty with the drizzled dark sauce.
I had my hopes held pretty high when I came here. Vegan food that taste like meat, hey, I'm open! I think one of their dishes accomplishes this very well: Their Generals chicken/orange chicken. I thought this dish was good, largely because it was deep-fried and much of the taste of these dishes comes from the sauce and the deep-fried nature. However, many of their other dishes, particularly those that were trying to imitate beef, I thought tasted like rubbery tofu (and I am a tofu lover, I just was not a fan of this one particularly). I think if you are coming to this restaurant excited to have good vegan food, you'll probably be happier that thinking you are coming to a restaurant to get "meaty" tasting vegan food. When I discuss this restaurant with my friends, we mostly go to show visitors for the novelty, but it never tops our list as a place to eat.
It's a really interesting idea. Their food really looks and tastes like american-chinese cuisine, but it is all made of soy. I question whether it is as healthy as some people say given how much deep frying and oil is involved. Still you should definitely give them a chance.
I enjoy both this place and the Mountainview incarnation.  The food is vegan, and I  think it's fantastic.  However, note that vegan doesn't necessarily = healthy.  There are definitely healthy options (veggie heavy options), and there are definitely more decadent options (anything fried).  Personally, I like the sweet and sour pork and anything with egglant in it. It's not a fancy place.  It's casual, laid back, and has local art on the walls (which I personally find interesting).  I like to do takeout from here or go with friends and eat family style.
It's not hard to find to vegan asian restaurants these days, especially in the bay area. You've got the loving hut chain all over the place, and even some omni restaurants will carry fake meats. But Garden Fresh definitely stood out from a lot that I've been to. What I probably appreciated most was the selection on the menu. It had some of the things you normally see at these kinds of restaurants, but enough different entrees and appetizers to make it stand out. My friend and I decided on the sweet and sour pork and the sizzling bean curd entrees. Both were of the perfect proportion and excellently made. I also appreciated the friendly, attentive service from the woman working the floor. I got the feeling that after a couple more visits, she'd have your name and favorite menu items memorized. She even didn't mind that we stayed in the restaurant several minutes after close as we finished up our conversation. Next time I'm down in this area, I'll definitely make a point to go back.
I am not a vegetarian, but I am Chinese, and I thought this place was rather delicious. I will have to admit that I ordered more traditional Chinese dishes, such as beef and broccoli and General's Chicken and the roasted duck -- they were all wonderful. The beef did taste more like soy compared to the mock poultry animals. If ordering here, stick with mock poultry animals, they will taste more like the actual stuff than the beef or pork. And get the duck, it is good!
This place is really good. The owner is very sweet and works at this location. You have to get the Orange Beef made from shitaki mushrooms and served with brocolli. It goes well with sweet and sour pork also served on brocolli.
This the first restaurant I have seen specifying itself as vegetarian only, with the stated intention of imitating meat flavors. I actually enjoyed it much more than I would have guessed, particularly the amazing crispy "duck" with broccoli - a dense mushroom meat imitation that I thought was spot on. The other dishes were all pretty good - wonton soup, "sushi" rolls, broccoli "beef," and sweet & spicy "chicken." While there are a decent amount of soy - based "meats," they do a good job of mixing it up and the dishes are flavorful and well beyond the lightly disguised tofu atrocities I was expecting.
Awesome food. Fresh, not greasy. The dishes tasted like real meat. I am thrilled to have this place so close to home. Prices are very reasonable too.  Only have been there for lunch so far.  But will definitely go back
This is my favorite Vegan place for Asian food. its worth the drive. Im not vegan or vegetarian but they really do know how to make food taste better than the real thing so thats why I give them 5 starts. The Lady who runs the store is friendly and she remembers when you come back. best customers service I had. Food was on time and hot. they make the best brown rice that goes well with the food. hints: make sure to show up early because the place is a bit small. its good for parties up to 4 or else they would have to move tables around. portions are pretty big so expect to take some leftovers for tomorrows lunch.
Absolutely wonderful. Probably my favourite vego place or at least in the top three. The food is crazy delicious and there's a huge variety. It's hard to pick favourite dishes because everything I've tried is excellent. We were there today for my husband's birthday and we had the grilled "salmon" filet and a serving of the soft roll (beancurd sheets rolled up and served with lots of fresh veggies in a fantastic brown sauce). The salmon was smothered in an incredible ginger sauce and was to die for. For me, this is saying a lot because there were little pieces of water chestnut in that sauce and I didn't make my bloke eat them (I'm not a fan of the water chestnut, see). They also do a fantastically good lemon chicken which I tried the last time I was there, tempting fate (I have a wheat intolerance, as opposed to having coeliacs, so I'll occasionally have a little wheat if I'm feeling brave). Holy shit, it was fantastic. Perfect lemon tang and delightfully crunchy. Seriously, just go, eat, enjoy.
I was vegetarian for a few years in California before returning to a Filipino lifestyle in NYC, so this was a great way to satisfy my genetic disposition to meat-eating. But regardless of whether or not you're vegetarian/vegan, the food here is deeeelish. Highly recommend the General's chicken, orange beef, lemon chicken, walnut prawns, Happy Family, and scallion pancakes. lol, I was a regular there when I used to work in Menlo Park, so I've tried about everyyything. Those are my faves. Oh, and Alice (the owner) is a SWEETHEART. Recently visited the bay area this past weekend and couldn't help but give Alice a billion hugs because I miss her and her food so much. Billion stars!
I've always been a fan of this place, but I'm writing this review to also share a personal story of how this place went above and beyond. I called and got Alice, and started ordering food. As always, I ordered my favorites walnut shrimp, orange chicken, corn soup and brown rice. Only this time, I can't pick up my order. I just had surgery a few days ago and when Alice learned about this she  immediately asked how I was and wanted to make sure I'm ok. I didn't have anyone to pick up my order, so she said she'll ask a friend to deliver for me if she can't make it. They don't really do delivery, but Alice went above and beyond to accommodate me. I have been sharing this with friends, and I'm sharing this with everyone. The random act of kindness that Alice and Garden Fresh did for me the other day is rare these days.
I don't know how else to start with this place: how do they have 4 1/2 stars? One could find this heat-and-serve crap from a Mexican Food Roach Coach that (curiously) had vegetarian Chinese food. I ordered the "Orange Chicken" and it was no better than a frozen TV dinner. Their 'fresh' salads were anything but. Service was reeeally slow and the ambiance was... weird. Artless photos lined the walls. AND THEY ARE OUTRAGEOUSLY PRICED. Alas, my idiosyncratic use of the Yelp rating system hasn't yet justified the long jump from two stars to one (I think one star should be reserved for restaurants you'd see in the third circle of hell), so you'll just have get away with two stars, Garden Fresh. Which by the way, is the most deceitful name EVER for this place. Surely the irony was not missed.
LUNCH REVIEW. Vegetarian/vegan Chinese food does not surprise me, but I will admit that a restaurant in DTPA promoting itself solely as such caused much skepticism. I'm glad MM suggested Garden Fresh for lunch, as I would never come here on my own. AMBIANCE: First off, the signage for the restaurant is terribly obscured. It took me a while to spot Garden Fresh while driving down Ramona. Management should consider investing in a bigger, more noticeable sign. The interior of the restaurant is pretty tiny, and crammed chock full of tables. Luckily for us we arrived later than the lunch crowd, so we didn't have to deal with crazy noise and overhearing neighboring conversations. SERVICE: Pretty much non-existent. I'm not surprised. When they did come around, staff were friendly. FOOD: Meh. Lunch specials include 2 scoops of rice and a complimentary bowl of soup (which was thickened with too much cornstarch). - Kung-pao chicken ($7.95): Super salty brown sauce with a nice amount of kick. Veggies were slightly undercooked for my tastes. The faux chicken was basically chunky gluten, which did not resemble chicken either in texture or taste. However if you just view the dish as a vegetarian dish (and not masquerading around as a meat dish), the flavors were fine (albeit too salty). - Kung-pao eggplant ($7.95): Not nearly as tasty as the chicken. First off, the portion size was way smaller. The eggplant wasn't fried/cooked long enough to soften the meat, and the tofu in the dish had zero flavor. OVERALL: I didn't feel particularly healthy chowing down on my dish, so if that's what you're looking for from the resto, I'd steer clear. Its nice that Garden Fresh offers an entirely vegetarian menu, but I'd venture to say that the dishes are no better (and in some cases worse) than vegetarian dishes you can get at other Chinese restaurants. However, if there's going to be a niche for this type of food, it would definitely be in DTPA, so good for Garden Fresh for finding where they fit in. I wouldn't be opposed to coming here again, but I wouldn't be the first to suggest it.
Good bites! Myself & 4 friends ate here on Saturday--we were not disappointed! The service was really good (restaurant was not packed at all), food arrived very timely, and it was yummy (except the salad wasn't that great--the only exception). Some of the items we had were: Spinach Wonton Soup, Veggie Buns, and Mu Shu vegetables to name a few. Not stellar food, but very yummy nevertheless! It's on my good list......
Umm... How did this place get 4 stars? Seriously? It tasted like really bad and Americanized Chinese food.
Yay brown rice! My friend really liked the veggie duck. I thought it was gd too, love tofu skin! But it was a bit too salty. Definitely very strong umami taste! Tofu delight was also pretty gd, black bean sauce! Lots of veggies :) yay for being healthy..
This is a low 4. Quiet place, friendly service. The pot stickers were bland and a bit too doughy. 3 stars. However, they redeemed themselves with the veggie duck, which was very good if just a bit too salty.
Whenever I come back to visit the bay area from Portland, I always set my expectations extremely high when it comes to certain style of cuisines. I expect every Thai restaurant to be just as good as some of the best up there, I expect there to be a Pho spot on every corner, and I expect the vegan/vegetarian spots to really be pushing the boundaries. Unfortunately, I'm usually disappointed every single time. Garden Fresh is a bit of a different story, though. In a place where there isn't a whole lot of animal-free options, Garden Fresh decides to serve a ton of traditional Chinese dishes with a vegan flair. This is very uncommon south of the city, and sometimes they manage to do it quite well. I have been here probably 50 times, but every dish I've had has been a coin toss. I have had some incredible, memorable dishes but I've also had some stuff that made me think "what the hell is this?" In my opinion, the three best dishes I've had were the "Duck", the Mongolian Veggie Chicken, and the scallion pancakes. The duck is mushroom based and has this lovely texture and delicious garlicy/ginger sauce. I believe the Mongolian Chicken is made of gluten and is slightly crispy, slightly sweet and very delicious. While the scallion pancakes wedge-sized little heart attacks, they are absolutely phenomenal. The reason I give this place 3 stars is that some of the other dishes I've had are not NEARLY as good as these 3 dishes. I opted for the General's "Chicken" tonight and it very much resembled sweet and sour pork (which  I despise that neon sauce) and it was basically little balls of fried breading. The curried tofu is another thing that I didn't particularly enjoy because it was kind of bland overall. If every dish at this place was just as good as the duck/veggie chicken/scallion pancakes, then this would easily be a 5 star restaurant. But unfortunately I have to go with 3 for inconsistency.
(1/6) Garden Fresh offers a unique culinary experiment with the aim of replicating Americanized Chinese food with vegan-only materials. The task is difficult; meat is rampant in Chinese food. But after coming here three times, I've realized that both real meat and real Chinese food taste better. The dish I recommend is Hunan Tofu, a exciting sizzling clay pot of tofu which is the closest to authentic you will find here. As for imitation meat dishes, I've had the Orange Veggie Beef at each of my three visits. The "meat" texture is solid, but I find that this dish, along with many other dishes here, to be too sweet. Real Chinese food shouldn't taste like that. For the vegetarian, I would definitely recommend coming here once to taste Garden Fresh's innovations in imitation meat. However, I feel that there are much better tasting vegetarian options (Indian food, for example). For a town like Palo Alto full of vegetarians, there is no doubt that Garden Fresh stimulates a niche market of taste buds.
Great little Chinese vegetarian restaurant just off University Avenue.  I wanted something cheap and delicious and Yelp pointed me this way.  I had their Kun Pao Veggie Chicken entree which comes with two scoops of brown rice.  The dish was flavourful and though the "chicken" didn't really taste like chicken it had a meaty texture.  The dish has peanuts which wasn't in the description so I'd advise to always ask if there are nuts in any dish if you're allergic to them.  The hot and sour soup that came with it was okay - a bit on the watery side but for the price point ($7.95 for the meal) it was a good deal. Service was friendly and fast.
First time here right after Sunday matinee at the Stanford Theatre right around the corner. I loved the spicy "chicken" and vegetable dish I had. Others can say more about the food from more experience but I found it tasty enough to distract me from conversation with my friend. The menu is large and varied. Service is somehow fast, friendly, and efficient all at the same time, without, I noticed, interrupting anyone in mid-sentence to ask if all is well. This little restaurant is simply but pleasingly decorated with artworks you can buy and, for those Yelpers who seem to really care about this, the restroom is modern, spotless, and actually pleasant. A block away you can find other Chinese/Asian restaurants with more conventional meaty/oily food but when it comes to flavor and freshness I think this one beats them. I'm going to organize other expeditions to the Stanford Theatre and the next time, I'm going to bring more buddies, and to this restaurant afterward because I want to try more dishes.
This is a great Chinese restaurant in Palo Alto :)! I have seen this place in yelp a lot, while searching for restaurants in yelp, and finally went there, since I had two Vegetarian friends over. One of the best chinese places I've been to in a while! the food was very delicious and the portions were pretty big. We got: Scallion Pancakes: delicious, one of my friends especially liked it. The Duck dish: really delicious! It kind of tasted like meat loaf actually. the sauce was really delicious and the veggies on the side went really well it it. The sweet and sour beef: delicious! it did kind of taste like meat. mongolian chicken: great! didn't taste much like chicken but it was tasty. Brown rice: very good. I am planning to go back here and take more friends with me :), I'll definitely order the sweet and sour beef and the duck dish again.
We had crispy tofu and tofu duck. The food was very yummy! I can't wait to go back.
I am not a vegan but I come here whenever I am craving Chinese Food. There is good flavor in the dishes and the food seems to be cooked in a healthy way. They serve brown rice by default so if you want white, better ask for it by name. The lady/owner is very nice - she is always willing to suggest a dish if you are confused by all the options.
I love this place. Garden Fresh in Palo Alto is my go-to spot for quick, delicious, fresh, hearty, inexpensive meals. While there are a few dozen vegan Asian restaurants in the Bay Area, Garden Fresh stands out for its creativity, variety and simpler, fresher presentations and preparations. This isn't just generic Chinese or Vietnamese stripmall food made with vegan mockmeats instead of real meat; Garden Fresh serves thoughtful, innovative and unusual fare. I've tried much of their menu and would highlight the following as my favorites: -Scallion pancakes with carrots ($5) is an awesome appetizer that is basically crispy, fried dough with some subtly sweet soy sauce; every single person I know who has tried this dish loves it, regardless of whether they're vegan or not -Orange veggie beef ($11) is one of the most unusual mockmeat dishes I've had; instead of using soy or wheat to make fake beef, Garden Fresh uses pressed shiitake mushroom. The end result is a slightly crisp, "meaty" slice of beef in a delectable orange-soy marinade with red chili. Definitely get this dish; you won't be able to tell that the beef is made with mushrooms, so even mushroom-haters should try this dish -Basil Tempura ($12) consists of batter-fried vegetables with basil and a spicy sauce. This dish sounds basic (tempura isn't all that exciting, quite frankly), but Garden Fresh's preparation is just different somehow (feels less oily) and blows away every other tempura dish I've ever had. -Black pepper veggie chicken ($11) is a bold and addictive dish made with lightly fried chicken, mushrooms, carrots and onions. A choice that everyone will enjoy. -Hunan veggie chicken ($10) is a solid mixed-vegetable stir-fry. It's one of few dishes on the menu that comes with more than one or two vegetables, which is nice. The service is always super-friendly and they give you a free cup of soup to start off. The food arrives quickly. My only issues: this place is tiny and it's usually full during peak times. Expect a wait if you have a group larger than 2 (and I recommend against groups larger than 4, given the limited seating). Also, I wasn't impressed with the desserts, which felt dry and had weird texture (go to Loving Hut around the corner for desserts instead). In conclusion, Garden Fresh is easily the best Asian vegan restaurant in the Bay Area, and just generally a creative and fun place that non-vegans will greatly enjoy (and perhaps prefer) as well.
Good selection, tasted great as well. Some of the dishes could have been a bit more adventurous.
Not much else to say that hasn't already been said here, but that won't stop me from saying it all again. This place is really freaking good.  And I'm a carnivore's carnivore. The "duck" is indeed oddly delicious, and seems to be made primarily of mushroom rather than tofu. And that's not a dig at tofu, as I loves me some tofu.  And I really love the Hunan Tofu here, but it's still not as good as that fake duck. Quack quack.
SUMMARY: If you're vegetarian or Vegan, this is the place for you. If you're not, you'll still like it. I love to eat beef, lamb, chicken, etc. Unfortunately, I'm surrounded by friends who have a difference of opinion on those items, and I choose to tolerate that. Thank goodness that Garden Fresh is around to keep all of us happy without needing to bicker back and forth about what restaurant to go to when someone wants purely veggie foods. PROS: + Friendly staff and service. + The food is surprisingly flavorful and well-cooked. It's very much an American-Chinese cuisine, so it should appeal to those who think real Chinese food is Sweet & Sour Chicken. At the same time, they have a few dishes that seem to trend more towards the "authentic" side of things (depending on what your definition of "authentic" is). + Food recommendations: * Scallion Pancakes - flavorful and well-made. Bring breath mints. * Orange Veggie Chicken - This seems to be a favorite among my friends. The flavors are good and the "chicken" has a nice texture to it. * Black Pepper Veggie Chicken - I really enjoy this dish. * I can't remember what else we've ordered since we get something new each time, but try a bunch of different dishes and I'm sure you'll find what you like. When ordering, try to get a good mix between the vegetable-branded dishes vs. the other "proteins" they offer. CONS: - It's not a very large location and can get rather packed on a weekend or Friday evening. RANDOM: = When he's not busy hunting his own food, Mark Zuckerberg eats here sometimes. = The Palo Alto location is much better than the Mountain View one. I don't understand why they have differentiated the menus so much, but I did not enjoy my visit to the MV location and will only go to the PA one as a result. EDIT: I originally had a comment about my not finding healthier options, but that was my fault for always ordering something unhealthy. They can do steamed or sauteed vegetables among other options. I just didn't know!
Umm, there were flies hovering around the restaurant Orange fake chicken - ok, too thick vegetarian chow fun - pretty good - 1 star vegetarian potstickers - pretty good 1 star service 1 star... we won't be back
My Last visit was on Sept. and met a non-veggie family. They did enjoy green meals like us. Green Menu Card holders will get free appetizer after $30 purchase. http://greenmenu.org/gar...
I like my veggies, but I also like my protein. So the idea of coming to a vegetarian place for dinner wasn't quite my first choice, but a friend highly recommended we go here. The owner was super nice and it helped that my friend is a regular here. We ordered three dishes, two of which were 'meat' dishes and we were all satisfied. I highly recommend the 'duck' dish, and the veggie chow fun tasted exactly the same as you would get at other Chinese restaurants. A plus for friendly service!
I'm actually surprised how much I liked this restaurant. I had the basil tempura with brown rice, and the scallion pancakes. Both were amazing! Chinese vegan is an excellent concept, even for the meat eaters. Owners Alice and Robert Liang stay true to the philosophy of vegan cooking. Other restaurants may claim a vegetarian hot and sour soup and use chicken stock. The Liangs stick to their guns, using fresh produce and making their own vegetable stock daily. I'm Dave N. and I approve this message.
This restaurant made me want to turn Vegetarian because it made me realize that you don't need to eat animal flesh for protein when you can just stay more healthier by eating like this. The Veggie Chicken Chow Mein and the Tofu Delight was my favorite This place is my favorite vegetarian restaurant, so come check it out!
Me and my buddy (who just loved this place the last time we went) came back to try another round of vegan cuisine. Not disappointed. ---------- 4.5/5: Scallion Pancakes w/ carrot sticks- Again, a genius pick for a starter. It's crispy and great for dipping in hot and sweet/sour sauce 3.5/5: Hot and Sour Soup- I really need the egg in here, otherwise it's magnefique. 5/5: General's Veggie Chicken- This was gangsta; Don't mess. 4/5: Beef w/ Broccoli- I really liked the imitation beef here. Although, not as tasty as I would have thought, I just added some hot sauce to make it real good. ---------- We are going to come back again
Came here with my two vegetarian friends. One of them sniffed the air as he walked in, smelling the... Read more 
Quick 1-time Review: This was my first and only time here. My friend and I were seeing a 7:30 movie at the Stanford Theatre, and we got to this place at 6:50. The hostess assured us we could get our food in 5 minutes, and we did! And the food was delicious and deceptively vegan. You could barely tell the soy chicken wasn't real chicken. Very good food! The service felt like we were the only people there, and the place was packed. I will definitely be stopping here again, and if I lived nearby, I'd certainly be a regular. Thank you, Garden Fresh!
It is great to have vegetarian Chinese food in PA, but this is much too greasy.  Many items here would be better served steamed than stir fried.
I'm not vegan or vegetarian, but I think this place is pretty cool. We took our vegetarian friend here for some dinner. It's quite small here and cozy. I really really liked the veggie duck. I was curious as to how it would taste. They did a good job of imitating the flavor. I was super addicted. I want to come back and order it again. Maybe try some of their other imitations.
I've been to vegan restaurants before, but nothing has tasted so fresh and clean as it does here. Not too oily or fried--a splendid balance of scrumptious ingredients and healthy preparation methods. Hot & sour soup, brown rice, Hunan tofu, and Mongolian veggie "chicken" for the win! It should also be noted how precious the owners are (husband and wife couple); extremely gracious and attentive, they made our first experience here a true treat! I will absolutely be returning here and am so happy to support a small local business like Garden Fresh.
I will always love Garden Fresh, even when it takes me an HOUR to park in stupid Palo Alto just so I can pick up my take-out! I've been a fan for years, and this newer location is really cute. I had the "beef" with broccoli, and it was a liiiiiittle bland... but I think that's only because my taste buds have become accustomed to unhealthy amounts of sodium. Nicest employees! AND ALL VEGAN I.E. COOL.
5 stars is a high bar. This gets 4 from me. But overall, here is the summary - Great owner who creates a motherly like atmosphere here - Awesome variety - No MSG which is great - A bit on the salty side so beware of that - Very very very reasonable prices - Solid portion sizes. Overall, a winner, and worth trying.
Creative Chinese.  One of my struggles with many Chinese restaurants is that they often fall into 3 buckets: 1. American Chinese (think PF Changs, Panda Express) - deep fried protein coated in a sauce with minimal vegetables 2. Traditional Chinese (we're going to put meat in everything and we won't be understanding of your desire to not eat an Oyster sauce or have pork with your tofu) 3. Fusion (interesting - but sometimes I want chinese) Garden Fresh is a little differant to me than most Chinese vegetarian restaurants.  Most focus on the fake meats and stay with the #1 I mentioned above (fried + sauce, minimal veggies).  Garden fresh takes a little more creativity in their approach. We had the fake duck.  Tofu skins with mushrooms and assorted veggies.  It actually tasted nothing like duck, but it was delicious.  It was more of a meat loaf in my opinion.  But I loved how it didn't try too hard to be meat.  It's not! We also had the curried tofu.  Kind of a fusion dish (#3), but not really.  More of a variation on a classic preperation. The owner is extremely friendly.  My wife is wheat free and she was knowledgable of what this means (many Chinese restaurants are not) and could tell us every dish where should could substitue tamari for soy sauce.  I can't tell you how refreshing this is. The ambiance is ok, nothing special.  Tile floors, wood tables, excessive amounts of bird photos hung on the wall.  Not hole in the wall, but definitely local! :) Tip - 1 entree + app is plenty for 2.  My wife and I actually think 1 entree is enough for us.
I love this place.  Veggie Chinese with no Buddha's Delight in sight. The place is clean and bright.  The staff is friendly and quick; the owner is super nice. We've enjoyed everything we've had after many visits.
Loved it. Took my family, coworkers, and friends here. Why? Because it suited everyone's taste and satisfied even the stricter of diets--vegans & vegetarians. The food has both a Chinese and Fujian influence as the owners are from Taiwan. It's got the ingenuity of an awesome cook who knows just how to create the same flavors and textures of the original dish, but better. Some faves: 1) Hundred-Layer Tofu 2) Singapore-Style Noodles 3) The "Salmon" dish 4) Lemon Chicken dish ...seriously, all of them are delicious. Some downers: 1) Small space, thus not good for large groups 2) Parking...aka downtown Palo Alto...however there is street parking and if you're lucky, there might be spots at the lot across the street.
Got a late dinner here at 9pm. Based on Yelp reviews, ordered the Scallion Pancakes and Basil Tempura. Scallion Pancakes: Fried and crispy which is non-traditional for me but very tasty. Everything fried seems tastier? Didn't have much scallion flavor so I would have called this fried pancake. There was some sauce drizzled on it and it came with a side of carrot slices. Basil Tempura: I was imagining large bland Japanese tempura but the tofu protein pieces are more manageable chunks that are fried tempura style. Then it is combined in a stir fry with basil and chili peppers. The tempura soaks up the yummy sauce.
BEST Scallion Pancakes EVER. ^_^ I love this restaurant. It's right across the street from where I get tattoos so now I'll go there before or after my session since I'm in the area anyway. I've stopped there a few times when driving home from SoCal too. So delicious. I get the lemon "chicken" -- to die for little gluten goodness. I love the service. The staff are super friendly and always give me a cup of soup while I wait! Just talking about this place makes me want to go there! lol (;
As a tourist from the east coast and a vegetarian, I was excited to find so many veg/vegan places. Garden Fresh is nothing much to look at. A very small, spartan place. But the menu was so diverse that I could happily overlook the place's lack of ambiance. We started with the fried veggie drumsticks. They weren't what I was expecting (although I had no idea what to expect). They came with a sweet-n-sour type sauce, which I don't like, but I dipped them in a little soy sauce, and they were great. As an entree, I had the back pepper fried veggie chicken. I asked for medium spicy. Apparently I need to recalibrate my spicy-meter because this was SPICY. I would have liked to have seen the dish served with less onions and more mushrooms and next time I'd order it non-spicy. The service was a little lacking, which I only noticed because I was dying for a refill on my water (which I never got). Also, the kind Asian lady that served us made a pretty big service faux pas in that when she brought the check, instead of just leaving it on the table, she asked us - my BF or me - which of us was paying. It wasn't fatal but was a little awkward, and she seemed a little judge-y when I said I was. Slight missteps aside, this place was good, and I'd go back to try some of the many other veg/vegan things on the menu. Just watch that spicy-meter!! :)
Sorta disappointing.  This is a cute place with friendly decor and a woman who joshed us a few times.  We started with the scallion pancakes, which were crispy and had a sweet sauce.  A good start.  As our first entree, we  had the General's chicken, which was sort of like sweet and sour chicken.  I was glad they used gluten instead of mushrooms for the "chicken," it had a good texture. On my brother's friend's recommendation, we got the orange beef... and were surprised to receive a plate of blackish slabs in sauce.  While not visually appealing, the texture was pretty good; however, there was a distinct lack of orange flavor unless you specifically got a sliver of orange peel in your bite.  Unimpressive.
Today, I tried this restaurant for lunch with my co-workers.  I went in with intrepditaion remembering how meat-flavored tofu (Tofurkey, anyone) always tasted like crap.  However, I gave the Orange Beef a try based on the previous Yelp reviews. I was greatly surpised by how the chef was able to mimic the taste AND texture of beef with slices of shitaake mushrooms.  They didn't have the lunch special of this dish, so I ordered the family-style dish thinking I would take the rest home as leftovers.  After a few delicous bites, I decided nothing would be taken home today. Yes, I ate every last bit of it.  The greatest thing about it: I feel little guilt over eating it all because it was nothing but mushrooms.  Even now, I'm still full from the meal.
I'm lowering my rating for now.  My last meal there was ordinary, and the Mongolian (vege) Chicken -- which is normally like nectar for the gods was more like pedestrian Chinese fare.  On this last visit, my food was a solid 3-stars . . . not bad, but nothing special. One thing I have learned over my several visits to Garden Fresh is that their appetizers are not great and not nearly as good as the entrees promise to be.  On this latest visit, we ordered the vegetarian chicken drumsticks and the pan-fried potstickers.  Both were blah.  The drumsticks, one would think, should have been as good as the drumsticks at any other vegetarian restaurant.  They weren't. Same type, but not as flavorful.  The potstickers were doughy and, flavorless.  Save  yourself the calories and the cash, and pass.  They don't even have their own dumpling dipping sauce; rather, they pointed to the salty soy sauce on the table.  My favorite appetizer among all that I have tried has been the scallion pancake, but even that wasn't so amazing (like the Orange Beef and the Mongolian Chicken) that I have scurried back for. Plus for super-fast service.  Minus for the intrusive and judgmental attitudes of the owner. It could have been an off night.  I hope so.  To give an old lover some leeway, I'm only lowering my rating by one-star (whereas the food more appropriately reflected a two-star decline).  I'll give Garden Fresh another go.  Could the chef have left?  Or perhaps moved to the Mountain View location?  If Garden Fresh disappoints next time, I may not seek it out as a destination in Palo Alto.
Garden Fresh is my new lover.  We're entering the co-dependent phase (or, at least, I am.  I think... Read more 
This place is wonderful. Carnivores and omnivores should not be wary of the vegan title here. Food was amazing. Friendly staff with meticulously prepared and presented food. Best peanut sauce of all time on the steamed veggie dumpling starter. Sweet and sour soup was nothing special, but the Kung Pao Eggplant was perfectly prepared with just the right balance of heat and sweet. The eggplant was a beautiful color and texture. The tofu skin wrapped pressed shitake mushroom "duck" dish was amazing, albeit just a bit salty.
This is probably my favourite restaurant so far in PA. I really enjoyed the food and was surprised how fresh it tasted and it wasn't greasy. We started with the wonton soup which was ok.. nothing spectacular.. However once the other dishes came out I was impressed.  We ordered the sautee veggies which were not overdone in sauce or garlic which quite often is how I find veggies at asian restaurants. We had the tempura basil chicken which was quite flavourful. The black bean chicken dish was incredible it was great. The place is very clean and there are some beautiful photos on the walls.
Awesome scallion pancakes and Basil Tempura - we tried both items based on Yelp reviews. The Tofu Delight lunch entree had plenty of veggies but was ok. Good portion sizes, though IMO the Basil Tempura is slightly overpriced. Friendly and quick service, clean ambiance. I'd come back again for vegan food.
This place is decent - good concept, great that they serve brown rice.  Some of the dishes were just so-so (like the shredded pork with tofu and the eggplant).  Duck is pretty good.  Standout at this place is the fish - wow!  The soy protein wrapped with seaweed is addictive!  I think I could eat that whole thing by myself.  Service is very friendly and accommodating.
Super nice mom&pop owners who treat you like family plus exceptionally delectable veg dishes.  I am normally not a huge fan of the faux meat/chicken/fish genre, so I appreciate the Garden Fresh flair that transforms these fake foodstuffs from wannabes into sublime cuisine.  The general's chicken is a family favorite, as is the hot&sour soup.  But it's all good, and each time we try something we haven't tried before, we have a new family favorite.  Garden Fresh leftovers taste great the next day too! (And probably two days later, but they never last that long.) The space is small, so if you're dining in, you may have to wait for a table.  On-street parking is abysmal, but there's always space in the garage.  Definitely not fancy or pretentious, which is why I like it.  That, and the food.
I love love love the one in Mountain View so I was excited to spot this location. What's more, they serve alcohol!!! Ok, maybe the food doesn't taste quite as incredible as the Mountain View location even though it's got the same owners, but it's still delicious. I don't know what they do differently, I mentioned this to the owner when I visited the Mountain View location. He said he would look into it. The service can be a tad slow at times, but it's always very friendly.
How do you get 5 stars? Serve great tasting, well-cooked food, and provide awesome, friendly service. I'm a very carnivorous chick, but I've been here a couple of times and have been surprised by how much I enjoy their vegan dishes. It's a great alternative to Sprout on nights when I don't feel like cooking, but still want to eat something healthy. I highly recommend the (veggie) duck. It's painstakingly prepared with a tremendous attention to detail and flavor. And it doesn't get more friendly and hospitable than Alice, the owner/server!
Surprisingly good food, very nice owner. We really liked the General Tsos "chicken" and also the black pepper chicken. Don't miss the scallion pancakes! We tried the orange beef but it wasn't as good as the other things. Good thing there are so many other yummy things!
I'm always so town when reviewing places that have good food and bad service- That said the star review is mostly about one dish, the amazing orange "beef" Skip the free soup, its a tasteless gelatinous concoction, only made edible with the chili sauce they put on every table. We got the scallion pancakes (awesome) the drumsticks (mostly awesome, needed sauce) and the potstickers (also desperately in need of sauce) Then the aforementioned Orange beed (SO GOOD) the "Pork" with vegetables (pretty tasty) and the Tofu skin with asparagus (avoid this) My biggest complaint other than the soup was the service and atmosphere, the place is small and loud, the lighting is too harsh, and weird, the waitstaff speaks basically no english, couldn't estimate how much rice we needed with our order, forgot our tea, and was too brusk for my liking. Go to this place for the food, not the service or atmosphere.
Very standard chinese vegan fare -- you can find your usual American Chinese dishes here with the protein replaced by gluten, mushrooms, tofu or soy products. The dishes were flavourful and well prepared. We had wontons in sesame sauce, which is slightly different from my expectations from the Chinese name, but it was good nonetheless. We also had the chicken chow mein and the shiitake mushrooms over bok choy. Both were solid. I do hope to see more vegetarian-only dishes instead of the mock-meat on the menu though. A true vegetarian place would have more of that! And don't tell me that this is what Chinese vegetarian is like. I've had plenty of Chinese vegetarian in Asia and it's more than mock meats and tofu. However the taste wins here despite of the slightly disappointing menu.
We were really craving some chinese food in Palo Alto, and checked out Garden Fresh, and I'll definitely be back here.  Right when we walked in, the service was great, and we were given many recommendations on what to order. The interesting thing about this place is that everything is Vegan.  normally, i'm not a fan of vegan food, but this place was an exception.  Most of the dishes are imitations of traditional chinese meat dishes, but made with vegetables.  We ordered a hunan tofu and a duck dish.  The duck dish was extremely delicious, and was made with purely tofu and vegetables (which you could not tell from eating it).  The tofu was delicious as well and had a great texture and sauce to it.  We also ordered a sesame noodle appetizer along with brown rice. Overall, I would greatly recommend this place.  The service and food quality are amazing.  We ordered our food to go, and the owner gave us free soup while we waited for our order.  Definitely recommend if you are looking for chinese food that has a creative twist to it
So yummy! I had the scallion pancakes and the sweet and sour "pork." It was very tasty. The restaurant was very clean and the service was very pleasant. I can't wait to go back. The only issue is that I wasn't aware of the $20 rule for using your debit card.
I am always amazed at the ingenuity of vegan cooking. They make anything taste like anything. Soy taste like shrimp. Rice taste like chicken. Something (afraid to ask) taste like pizza, even with the 'pepperoni' rounds right on top. I got the sushi bowl, and I swear, if I didn't know most of the clientele would barf at real fish, I would say they slipped some fish in my bowl. It tasted awesome. My wife got the 'pizza' and it looked and I had a bite, tasted good too. Recommended, even for non vegan eaters.
Delicious and decently priced! I was a little skeptical of going to a vegan restaurant, but it ended up being quite good. If you're in a group and everyone is hungry, this is a good place to go for a family style meal. The fake meat isn't chewy and gummy like it can sometimes be, and usually tastes almost like the meat it's trying to be. The sauce is always good and delicious when mixed with rice. That said, there are definitely better options on University, unless you are aiming for true vegan. Between this place and Loving Hut, I'd probably go here.
I am not vegan or even vegetarian, if anything I like flirting with vegetarianism.  We try to eat vegetarian during the week, so it's nice to know that there is a place in walking distance to get some delicious food. I had the "fish" dish and it was absolutely perfect.  My husband had eggplant he loved it.  Def going to be a place we continue to visit.
I absolutely love this restaurant.  No matter what item I try on the menu I love it.  The dishes are so flavourful.  It isn't easy getting selections when you are vegetarian and I imagine even harder when you are vegan.  I have also eaten at its sister location in Mountain View.  A husband and wife team run these restaurants.  The husband in Mountain View and wife in Palo Alto.  The service is personal and fast.  My favorite place to eat!!
Ended up here completely by accident, and I'm glad I did.  Tasty food, great service.  They were really patient with the moody teenagers, late comers, and spirited 4 year old that we had in our party. Sweet and Sour Veggie Pork.  That was something to write home about. Yum. The only thing I'm keeping back a star for is the prices, but I guess that's what you get for dining in Palo Alto.
I think the high rating on Yelp set my expectations pretty high. I'm not vegan, but I am vegetarian. I've dabbled in veganism slightly (a few weeks to a month here and there) and I gotta say... if you're looking for a junk food vegan meal, this place will be fine. I was expecting more of the raw, vegetable-based vegan fare. I don't even remember what dish I had (yeah, it was that great), My brother was okay with his "pork" dish. Sister-in-law had "salmon" that I tried and it just... no... The appetizers were pretty good. Spring rolls and pot stickers. I don't think we'll be back again. Service was good and the people were very friendly, I just dislike junk-food vegan and vegetarian fare. Just give me real veggies, please.
The word "vegan" usually scares me. But this place's Chinese vegan is pretty good. This place isn't anywhere that I'd rave or rant about, but given its meatless-ness, this meat-eater is convinced that vegan CAN be delicious. Just don't try to understand the difference between "chicken" or "beef" here, because it all looks the same. And just about tastes the same, with some subtle variations in flavor. That being said, this place does satisfy that chinese food craving without all the added guilt :)
I've known Alice & Robert for years (owners). I have followed them from restaurant to restaurant. The food is so fresh & tasty you wouldn't know it's not meat. Wonderful alternative to the normally heavy chinese fare. I love Garden Fresh!!!
Not a vegetarian. In fact, I love lamb chips, pork chop, medium rare steak... But if all vegetarian food taste like this, I can be converted ;)
A cozy little joint with some really good fake Chinese food. I am not a huge fan of crazy tofu stuff, so I stuck with real food. The scallion pancakes were delicious and the the spicy eggplant was also very good. Considering the price, this place really hit the spot.
I'm not a fan of vegetarian food, but this place converted me with their orange beef made of shitake mushrooms.  The food is flavorful with texture.  It's definitely a gem in this strip mall if you're looking for something healthy, tasty and fast. Parking is ample in the lot.  Service is fast, friendly, and helpful.  The ambiance is simple, clean and tiny for a small restaurant with a few tables.
I'm glad Garden Fresh opened a downtown PA location! Great service and always delish food. The owner, Alice, is incredibly welcoming. Some of my favorites so far: chicken curry, veggie fish, and sweet and sour pork. The fish especially amazes me as it has just the right texture and taste. Soon going to try more dishes!
It's a nice and cozy restaurant tucked away on Ramona St, away from the mainstream stuff... It was my first time here, thought it was good enough for another try... not a fan yet... Service was friendly and prompt. Place looked clean. Ordered: Scallion pancakes -- Good, if you've never tried it before. it was a tad too oily. Hunan tofu -- Good, tasty Singaporean noodles -- spicy. But not much flavor to it Sweet corn soup -- really good Brown rice all split between 3 people - family style... The good thing is that the menu is extensive, so going again and trying out new things should be exciting. I will give it another try but before I do that, I will scope the neighborhood for similar restaurants
I came here awhile ago with a friend for dinner on a weeknight. The restaurant wasn't that packed, so we got a nice table by the window. We ordered the veggie duck and kun pao eggplant to share. Since I hadn't really had soy meat before, this was kind of a new experience for me, but overall, the dishes were flavorful and the service was quick. At these prices, I would come back to try some of the other 'meat' offerings. -L.
Holy Moley!!! Came here to eat with my parents and Jen, we had: - Moo Shoo Roll - Tofu in Clay Pot - Lettuce wrap - Sweet and Sour Vege Pork - and something else stir fried and it's all SOOO delicious! I definitely recommend the Moo Shoo roll. 2 rolls for about $2! I don't know how but this tasty dish was only seasoned with salt! No msg, LOVE =) This place is pretty small so you may have to wait for a table but it's worth the wait. They have another restaurant in Mountain View which has stronger tasting dishes so if you opt for intense flavors, you may want to try that place out. Personally, I'm the girl who likes dressing on the side (restaurants usually overdo dressing) so I prefer the PA location. The food was great, service is fast and friendly, overall- a great vegetarian dining experience.
Garden Fresh is one of the best vegan restaurants in the peninsula. Alice is always SO sweet and welcoming as well as all the other staff members, and their new location is beautiful! I'm so happy for them and their success, they really deserve it. The food of course is more than delicious, when I go it's usually with at least 2-4 people and we usually each order one dish and then share (I say this because last time I was there, a customer asked the waitress "so how does this work?" referring to the typical ordering process). The food is also always brought out in a reasonable amount of time, I've never felt like I was waiting too long. The menu is extensive (40+ items!) and cheap! Everything I have tried was amazing. And for all you bitter, living-in-denial omnivores, lay off the vegans for liking this place! We're allowed to enjoy greasy, fried food every once and a while too! :)
Went to Garden Fresh for lunch today with a friend - boy, was it a good choice! Full disclaimer: we're both vegetarians, but my friend (who eats seafood) was still raving at how the walnut prawn dish we got resembled the texture and taste of true shrimp. That dish was absolutely amazing - the veggie shrimp were fried inside a light batter, with a succulent sauce over it and topped with walnuts. My only complaint is that the dish was rather small for its price ($14). We were also happy with our second dish (we shared both), which was a veg. chicken dish. It wasn't quite as spectacular as the walnut prawn dish, in my opinion, but was still quite tasty. We also received complimentary bowls of some kind of tofu and corn soup, which started off the meal nicely. The restaurant itself is a little cramped (and can be quite noisy if it's full, as a result), but I was very pleased with the food we got!
Yummy in the tummy is the feeling you come out with when walking out of Garden Fresh.  Have no doubt that regardless how hungry you come, you'll definitely leave full with well sized dishes that come out ready to be devoured. I used to be a veggie and still stick to it most of the time, but for those of you who are big into the meat/fish, I think you'll be fully satisfied at Garden Fresh.  We started off with the complimentary sweet and sour soup, which was enough to relieve some of the I'm super duper hungry feeling.  Then we had the tofu delight with brown rice which was good.  However, my favorite was the spicy Kung Pao Chicken.  I think next time I'd like to try the basil tempura which was recommended by Alice.  I'd also say it's good to go here with 3 other people--that way you can try more than 2 of the dishes ;)
Let me start out by saying that I've never considered myself a fan of vegetarian/vegan food. I never cared for fake meat and tables heaping with vegetables. Garden Fresh changed my mind. I was quite apprehensive when my friends chose this establishment for a girls night out in Palo Alto. My fears were definitely dispelled the moment we sat down. Delicious smells wafted all over the place and jammed themselves into my unsuspecting nose. Ordered the duck (they also have vegetarian fish, shrimp, beef, etc), Hunan Tofu Claypot, and the chicken chow mein. First word that comes to mind when I reminisce on that wonderful meal is FLAVORFUL. Explosion of flavors in and out off my mouth. So, cross out that myth that vegetarian food is bland. Everything was so delicious that I wanted to order the entire menu. The duck, while not super ducky, was still a treat. PLUS, no bones! As a lazy eater, bones are my enemy. It was drenched in a corn starchy clear sauce with broccoli and other vegetables. Hunan tofu pot had chunks of fried tofu and vegetable covered in delicious brown sauce. The center of the tofu was so SOFT. I LOVE that kind of tofu. Chow mein was excellent. Noodles cooked to the perfect chewiness, sauced correctly...yum. Minus a star for service. Waitress didn't seem to be on top of her game. We had to ask for water, twice, and we barely ever got refills unless we asked. Will go back until I've tried the entire menu. And then I'll just eat everything all over again.
Wil J. wrote and suggested this place to be added to my Palo Alto vegan dining list. Thank you for the information. I heard of the Mountain View location but never had the pleasure of eating there. This location is where a Korean restaurant used to be, next to Mandarin Gourmet. It's very clean. Staff is friendly and helpful. The food vary from the usual Vietnamese vegan places (more Chinese) and from Loving Hut (no crazy vegan literature to scare people off), which is nice. Iced water with lemon is also a great touch. I ordered spicy string beans. My vegetarian coworker who's never had Asian style fake meat before was overjoyed to eat sweet and sour pork again. The green onion pancakes were too greasy. I'll probably forgo next time. Soup was slightly bland but nothing white pepper can't fix. Other than those minor flaws, their food was tasty, vegetables were cooked just right. and our glasses were constantly refilled. We enjoyed our meals. Will be back!
My friend and I were meeting up in a halfway place between her home in San Mateo and where I work, and Palo Alto seemed to be the most logical choice.  We were both supposed to be dieting in anticipation of her wedding (we needed to look hot after all) so after consulting Yelp we went with Garden Fresh. We ordered the following: -  Fried tofu with sweet chili sauce -- pretty self-explanatory, and simple but still very tasty -  Basil tempura -- now what I really expected, actually.  It was tempura fried "chicken" in a basil and brown sauce, probably my favorite items that we ordered -  Hundred layer tofu -- I was expecting, well, layered tofu, but, it ended up being some firm tofu over a bed of spinach, and not all that impressive, unfortunately Service was extremely nice and really good to us.  The focus of the food here is healthy living and good choices, and they have them all here.  Prices are a little more expensive than I was expecting -- about $22/each including tax and tip, but still pretty tasty  Would i return, probably, but maybe a Friday during Lent, instead!
The food is very tasty but a little bit on the oily side...and that's the only reason why I took off a star. I'm not vegan, just lactose intolerant, but love vegetarian and vegan food. The customer service is so great. The restaurant is owned by a very nice Chinese couple. While my friends and I were waiting for our takeout, the lady brought us bowls of soup. It was such a nice gesture. She also helped us load the food into our car. Food: Orange veggie chicken - very very tasty but a little bit on the saucy and oily side...it's delicious though! The soy protein tastes just like chicken! Ming beef - very tasty but the "beef" has a very dark color which makes it look a little bit unappealing.  However, it was still delicious. Tofu delight - variety of veggies and great taste! They also offer vegan desserts from Black China Bakery and Maggie Mudd's!  Being lactose intolerant, I was super excited to see this on their menu.  I'll definitely have to order dessert next time!
This place was really good, and not saying that because I used to be a pescatarian. Things I recommend: -basil tempura (lightly fried fake meat) -pancake Prices are okay but something one should try.
General tso chicken and duck were good. Orange beef disappointing. Singapore noodle good. Scallion pancake were just OK.
Vegan & Soy......Dinner  on a Thursday evening, pretty close to closing time.  Waitress suggested onion pancakes and we also ordered chicken chow mein.   Thumbs up for the pancakes, chow mein.  Both either rather light  on the pallet and easy to eat w/o meat. Food is good and priced for PA.  Service is good.
I'd like to give a comparison to Loving Hut (worldwide vegan chain with multiple stores in the bay area)... Frankly, I like GF better than LH.  It was lighter in taste and not completely drenched in salt & sauce as commonly found in LH.  I felt the ingredients were as fresh if not more fresh and I like the fact that it was more homey and quiet.  As in, at LH...there's constant TVs on..spreading the gospel about how awesome vegan is and how many awesome celebrities/athletes are vegan.  I like educating people, but I came to eat.  Not to get educated. Food Basil tempura - recommended by fellow yelpers.  I concur to the fullest.  Fried, but not so fried, mushy tempura.  Hard to describe...but those are the immediate words that come to my mind. Happy family black mushrooms with Bok Choy - light.  I like light, stir-fried veggies.  Definitely, a dish I can easily cook at home...but still very yummy! One last thing I really appreciated about the spot was that it is a Mr Rogers neighborhood place.  When we sat there for during an hour lunch on a Saturday we practically felt at least 75% of the customers were regulars!  The server knew their names, they knew the server's name..hell, they even grabbed soda for themselves and the server was totally cool with it!  Gotta love it.  That's when you know this place is a good thing.
SQUEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! [Clears Throat, Regains Sultry Baritone...] I was pretty excited to see that Garden Fresh had opened it's Palo Alto location.  The owner (Alice) told me about a few months ago and I've been googling from time to time for updates (I don't make it out to Mountain View as often as I used to). Point: I'd been going to their previous location for Years, even before ownership changed.  I miss Jin. I walked in for lunch today and Alice seemed genuinely shocked to see me and asked how I found her.  Ok, I could have really taken that the wrong way, but it was too funny not to laugh.  She remembered my usual (which surprised me since I have a bad habit of disappearing for months to years at a time). Point: Alice creates a warm comfortable atmosphere for her patrons. I recommend... Experimenting!  It's not about a single dish here, but the fact that Everything on the menu is Vegan (and delicious).  For Vegan Cuisine, the menu is large and available online at their web site. http://gardenfresh.us/lu... http://gardenfresh.us/ch... As far as my favorites: I always enjoy the Hot & Sour soup, the scallion pancake is a guilty pleasure and the General's Chicken is an easy default.  The Crispy Fried Tofu Stuffed with Minced Vegetables is a good one to share. Take medium sized group, get a bunch of different items and find a favorite (or 3) of your own. Did I mention I'm really happy about this new location?
This place is all vegan food and I must say I am quite impressed.  They have tofu beef, tofu chicken, tofu shrimp, tofu salmon, and tofu duck!  I was pretty impressed some of the dishes--the texture and taste of the tofu chicken in the Black Pepper chicken was strikingly like that of actual chicken.  They pretty much have any Chinese dish you can think of--except the meat has been replaced with tofu meat.  The dishes are quite good, and of course healthy. The place is small and I like the lights and paintings they have on the wall.  Service was quite quick. As a meat-eater, I still prefer my meat, but overall, the food here is tasty and delicious.
This place is pretty tasty.  We had a few veg items and as i'm typing this i want to go back.  Unfortunately, we came here a few weeks ago and i can't quite remember exactly what we ordered.  We will definitely go back and i'll update my review!!
Alice ruuuuuuuuuuuuuuuules. straight up. best part of this place is Alice. super nice and super awesome. this is dat new spot for Garden Fresh...(which is conveniently a little closer to me)...in downtown Palo Alto. i've been going to dat Mountain View joint for a few years now and have always left that place content. all vegetarian food, no bullsh!t, and all good as hell (and trust me, i've tried a looooot of everything). but n-w-wayz, if u r a n00b 4 realz, just order this and git ready 2-b stoked: -deep fried drum sticks (get a LOT of these, and i mean a LOT, a LOT) -general's chicken -kun pao eggplant -sweet and sour pork -orange chicken ...and yeah. that's da jam. big upz to them for opening a 2nd spot on the Peninsula! congrats on the nice location and the great reputation you guys got going. much love. s!qshit.
Nice little Chinese vegetarian restaurant in the peninsula. Just as good as a lot of the well known ones in the San Francisco area. Me and my friend wanted a lighter dinner and headed here to try. They only serve brown rice and all the meat is made from tofu. It's kind of like eating fake food but delicious fake meat. We ordered the duck and sweet/sour pork. I was skeptical about the duck but it was actually quit delicious and the sauce made it taste pretty close to duck. They even imitated the fat under the skin with tofu! The service is above average for a Chinese restaurant. They even ran out after me when I left and forgot my doggybag for the next day. I'm not a vegetarian but I like this place. I'll be back!
This is my first time here. I'm not a vegan but I still like vegan or vegetarian dishes once in a while. I was craving something spicy and vegetables and I was walking by and remembered this place. I went in o order takeout lunch since I needed to get back to work. They have lunch specials that come with rice and if you eat there, you also get soup. I got the spicy Japanese eggplant dish with tofu (can't remember the exact name) which I thought was good. The sauce was a sweet and tangy basil sauce but it was a little too sweet for my taste so I mixed a lot of it with the brown rice. I think I had only 4 pieces of tofu and plenty of eggplants that were cooked to a perfect softness. I thought the dish was a little oily but it's Chinese food so it wasn't much of a surprise. The price wasn't too bad for the lunch. I do plan on going back and trying some of their noodles dishes that I noticed people were eating.
This place is every bit as good as the mtn view location, with slightly better atmosphere. The menu is not exactly the same, but it is as nummy! The service is fast and friendly, and the waitresses are happy to help you choose something from their intimidating number of choices. Go support them since they're new, and help them grow!
"That's it, I have decided." ~ My girlfriend, just before announcing we're going to Garden Fresh for dinner.  No, I have no idea why she has to preface it with such a declaration, but I've got a bit of a Pavlovian response to the statement now.  If she's decided, I'm automatically hungry. I've absolutely loved every single thing I've tried here, which is saying a bit as we've probably cleared a third of the expansive entree list by now.  Their crispy fried sesame beef is amazing, their veggie bundles wrapped in ham are amazing, their duck is amazing...are you getting the idea, here?  And it's all vegan, and unlike a lot of Chinese it never sits like a rock in the tummy no matter how silly you stuff yourself.  And you will either stuff yourself, or you will get a doggie bag: they don't skimp on the portion size.  (You could leave your leftovers I guess, but that's just not an option with food this tasty.) The staff's ultra-friendly too and recognizes us immediately even though I wouldn't call us regulars (yet...it's starting to turn into a deliciously biweekly thing for us).
This place is phenomenal! My boyfriend and I first explored this restaurant through their super helpful website (which includes their full menu) and decided to try it out.  The place was pretty full when we got in, but we were seated immediately and received devoted service throughout our stay, including complimentary soup almost as soon as we sat down. We ordered the Hunan Veggie Chicken, Tofu Skins and Asparagus, and the Veggie Beef and Broccoli dishes--  and we were both very impressed.  I loved that the sauces were savory without being too sticky, oily, or anything else that'll leave that heavy bubble of "I-just-ate-WAY-too-much-Chinese-food" in your stomach. You will not be disappointed by this little restaurant, especially if you order that irresistibly delectable Tofu/Asparagus plate!
Please don't get mad at me vegans. I'm going to be honest, I have been eating vegetarian lately more reason than not since I just feel like too much meat doesn't make me feel good. That said I have been trying out alot of vegan and vegetarian places as of late. But here's the thing with this place: I get no dairy and no meat products idea here and the concept of serving healthier food. But frying stuff, using heavy sauces and alot of processed "faux" meat (duck, shrimp, chicken, beef) is also not the healthiest way to go vegan. It tastes great and the faux stuff looks pretty darn real in most cases. But let's not fool ourselves and think that we are getting the healthiest option available. That said, the food was pretty good. I liked it alot. I loved the fact that the faux stuff looked pretty authentic. I loved the fact that they took alot of my favorite carnivorous Chinese dishes and made their own vegan version. (Honey shrimp with walnuts, chicken chow fun, and orange chicken are just a few examples). The flavor is good, the dishes are nicely presented, and I think you could bring the heartiest meat-eater and find that he/she could survive and maybe even like the food.
Have been here a few times. Mostly for lunch but have been for dinner too. I am vegetarian so this place helps. Better than Loving Hut.. They dont use too much of that fake meat here and the idea is not to make things meat tasting, which seems to be the focus at Loving Hut. Kung Pao Chicken is good and the noodles are very well made. Service is excellent, always cheerful. Dont take Credit cards for amounts less than $20(?) . I dont like that.. but food and service is very good. and yes, the pancakes ... yum yum yum
Found this place a little over a year ago and let me say this place is fantastic..and I am a meat eater! There is such a wide selection of dishes on their menu so I try to pick something different every time.  Generals Chicken, Sweet & Sour Pork, Hunan Chicken, Onion Pancakes....YUMMY! Service is great, fast and priced well. The only downside, is that this location is a little on the small side so call ahead you need to. Give this place a try, you won't be disappointed!
Love it! I don't like most regular Chinese food. It's usually just too... MUCH. Too fried, to saucy, to MSG-y. Garden Fresh has good Chinese food. Garden Fresh has good food in general - the seasoning, sauce, and preparation was all excellent. We started with the scallion pancakes and potstickers. Both were AWEOME. Especially the pancakes. Some of the vegan items like 'duck' and 'fish' scare me, so we stuck with the basics that were more of the imitation chicken. We got orange chicken and General Tso's chicken. Both were fantastic. The two women running the place were so attentive, excited, and pleasant to be around. I'll definitely be back.
Went to this place because of Yelp.  It was so good!  Definitely get the orange beef- and ask the owner about the process to make it.  They put a lot of time into making this restaurant delicious and it truly pays off.  There is nothing like the texture or taste of that dish. The owner is super nice too!
I've been to the other location as well and the food is every bit as delicious!   Again, I'm not vegan but once I tried this place, I was definitely hooked.  This new restaurant has a friendly and warm ambiance with large open windows. I had the fried onion pancakes and it was delish!  This is one of the staples that I always get.  The fried tofu was awesome too, mostly soft tofu with just a little crisp on the outside that goes wonderfully with the sauce.  And the eggplant dish was phenomenal, I always try to cook it but it never comes out this way.  The hot and sour soup was flavorful and enjoyable as well. Definitely coming back soon!
i wanted to be adventurous and see just how much they can stretch the vegan concept so i got the walnut shrimp which normally should have tons of shrimp and mayo. i dont know what they used as shrimp subsitute but that and the vegan mayo was delicious. definitely recommended though i got the soup and entree and it set me back ~$20 with tip
I LOVE THIS PLACE. I brought my vegan housemate here for the first time last night after frequenting the Mountain View location and then the new Palo Alto spot with friends. We had the deep-fried veggie drumsticks which are king. Meaty texture, ya'll won't BELEE it ain't chicken! Split the Hunan Chicken and Chicken Curry. Delicious. Hunan Chicken is very peppery and flavorful and I loved the texture of the mock chicken in the curry. Kind of spongey, which may not sound appetizing, but it soaks up all that curry goodness. Great service too, the lady owner definitely keeps up with her regulars. She seemed to recognize me too from the Mountain View location or maybe she's just being a friendly gal. Fuck yeah Garden Fresh!
Delicous! I was thrilled when they opened in Palo Alto because I had been going to the Mountain View location for a while. Some dishes are excellent (others are somewhat bland) but we love the kung pao eggplant, scallions pancakes, and mushu veggie.
This is my first time at their Palo Alto restaurant, but have been to the Mtn View one dozens of times. PA is like a reincarnation of the Mtn View restaurant but the decor is much nicer. If you enjoy fried foods, I recommend the Scallion Pancakes. Two of us shared preceding, plus Black Pepper Veggie Chicken, brown rice, and total with tax and tip was $24. We didn't gormandize as we usually do so preceding plus the complimentary corn and tofu soup was a lovely dinner.  Everything was delicious, and I've long been a fan of their corn and tofu soup. To James, the self-described "solid carnivore", as to why veggie people eat faux meats (stepping up on soap box):  when I choose to eat them, I eat "it" (a plant-based product) for the taste and the texture.  I forsake meat because I disagree with "someone" (an animal) suffering and dying just for my few pleasurable seconds of chewing on their burnt corpse. I do understand why some veggie people choose not to eat faux meats.  I rarely cook with fake meats at home, and its become more of a luxury food when I dine out.
Wow, 144 reviews already? I knew this place didn't open all that long ago... It's an outpost of the one in mountain view on el camino. I prefer it, actually, because I can find it easily without thinking I'm going to get rear-ended by some big truck/SUV/minivan barreling down el camino and not noticing my tiny little car with the confused driver (i.e. me) reading the roadsigns and trying to remember which ice-cream joint it was close to. Yeah, I get lost a lot. El Camino is still my favourite street in California, because I love to eat, but sometimes it's just too crazy. Ramona in Palo Alto is much more sedate, even if this place looks fairly low-key it is still easily recognizable. I've heard people have trouble finding parking around here but I've never had a problem. Ditto on wait-time. I don't think I've ever had to wait for a table, and sometimes it's been pretty busy, more than 3/4 full. Sometimes it's empty. Service always good. We eat here so often we get recognized by the proprietor, although I suspect she has a really good memory. All the food is tasty; Basil Tempura highly recommended. If you read my other reviews, you know I'm not vegan or vegetarian, and I don't just eat Chinese food. As long as you're open to eating a meal without meat, I don't think you'll have a bad meal here.
If I was a vegetarian and could eat here everyday life wouldn't be so bad.  I am not a vegetarian, love meat but took a few friends here since downtown Palo Alto just doesn't have any good chinese food.  There was 6 of us for lunch, family style we just ordered a ton of food. Sorry I can't recall which dishes but I do remember everyone thinking they couldn't believe some of the dishes weren't actually real meat!  Flavor across the board was good.
Great food...
Great place! Me and my husband have been here loads, and just keep going back. We're veggies are it's great to go to a place and can have anything on the menu, not just salad, all the food is great, and tastes amazing. I would definitely recommend it to anyone, weither you're a veggie/vegan or not, everyone has to try this place at least once! The staff are also super friendly. I'll be back here again soon!
chicken made of shiitake mushrooms? consider my mind blown. If other vegan places are as good as this one, I think over time that I could be tricked into not eating meat. We ordered the scallion pancakes, orange chicken, and shiitake mushrooms & bok choy.  The scallion pancakes were really light and fluffy, which is different from 'normal' chinese places where I order them.  They're usually really dense and greasy, still delicious.  The orange chicken, however, was a big surprise. I've always been afraid of non-meat things shaped as meat (uh, tofu dogs? bleh!) , but I was amazed at how yummy this was (the chicken is made from shiitake mushrooms). This is also coming from someone who's been eating red meat practically from birth (go texas!). Very yummy and different from the usual food I eat.. will definitely come back here.
I love Garden Fresh. It's fantastic. I used to drive 30-40 minutes to get there, and now there's one 20 minutes from my house and ONE BLOCK from my work!! Can it get any better? Yeah, maybe if it was free and they served it to me in bed... A girl can dream... Oh yeah, they don't take credit cards at this location yet, but rumor has it they will starting around April 10th.
Delicious vegan food. Pretty much like a normal Chinese restaurant but everything on the menu is vegan.  Even the non-vegetarians were happy. Fried tofu appetizer is very tasty. Personally I don't like fake meat much and didn't find the fake meat dishes that the non-vegetarians wanted to try terribly exciting.  They were good for what they were, but I'd stick to the tofu and vegetable dishes myself. The owner is very friendly and accommodating of food allergies and was able to make all of the dishes our group ordered gluten free on request. The main quirk of here is that they don't like to take credit cards very much.  There is a minimum of $20 and even above that pressure is applied to pay in cash.  Make sure you bring cash if you plan to order only a couple dishes.
Tasty Asian food, friendly service, and a full vegan menu.  What more could you ask for? Tucked away on Ramona Street, you're unlikey to accidentally stumble on this place, even though it's only half a block off University Ave.
Hello Yelpers! I was stuck in the office on a wednesday nite.  GF came to visit me at work so we grabbed dinner.  She's always been a fan of loving hut so she wanted to give this place a try. First off, this place is a small joint in Palo Alto.  Seemed smaller than loving hut but with a more "at home" feel.   If it wasn't for the happy faces I saw through the window, I probably would have walked past it. We ordered the following to go: Basil Tempura - this was based off a recommendation by the employee there.  She showed us what it looked like as it came out of the kitchen and my, my, my... it looked great!  Lucky for us, it tasted as good as it looked.  If I didn't tell you this is a vegetarian dish, you would think your eating meat.  If I would definitely order this dish again Kung Pao Eggplant - ordered this because I'm a big fan of eggplant.  The eggplant was cooked amazingly because they had just the right consistency when you bite into it. Although both dishes were suppose to be spicy, they barely registered on my hotness meter.  That was actually a positive for me because I'm not a fan of super spicy foods (especially thai).  We had it with brown rice to keep with the theme of healthy living.  =) After ordering, the food came out in about 5 minutes.  As we waited, they served us some of their daily soup (which was not necessary but definitely appreciated). I'd definitely come back to try out some of their other dishes.
The food was good especially the black pepper chicken recommended by the friendly young waiter. But, they never turned on the air conditioner even it was 93 degree outside. Can you bear it ? Enjoy the food and amicable service if you could. Otherwise.........
Seriously is some good food! All of their dishes are vegan and very tasty, They are a healthier alternative to our usual lunches. The lady that works there (I think she's the owner) is very nice. Our food is always cooked fast and it's DELICIOUS.
So I'm not a vegan, or a vegetarian for that matter. But this place get's some of the best reviews for Chinese food in Palo Alto and my husband is always in the mood for "lighter fare" Chinese food. We were glad we tried it out. It was great Chinese food in general and it was great vegan food as well. Most folks wouldn't notice too much to let them know the dishes weren't really the meats they were emulating. I recommend the General's Veggie Chicken!
What an interesting new Chinese restaurant in downtown Palo Alto!  Chinese food should 1) taste good, 2) feel casual, and 3) not be ridiculously expensive.  And, Garden Fresh Vegetarian Restaurant hits all three of these criteria. Although I am a meat-arian, I can definitely appreciate vegan fare, and this restaurant does two interpretations very well.  First, their vegetarian dishes that are heavy on greens and tofu are great and authentic-tasting.  Second, their meat-like dishes are also done very well.  The highlight for me was the Singapore Style Rice Noodle -- there's just something about the texture of mildly curried thin rice noodles! Of course, the highlights are the appetizers.  The basil moo-shu rolls are bright and fresh and the scallion pancakes with pickles are a definite must. As your get to the Palo Alto location, you might be tempted to go to the Mandarin Gourmet, which is just two doors down.  Don't bother, as Garden Fresh surpasses it not only in the sub-category of "vegetarian Chinese food", but also as just "Chinese food" period.
I kind of hate how much I love this place.  I've been the past three nights, and one of those nights I'd already had dinner.  But when the offer to go to Garden Fresh arises, I can't turn it down.  Even if I'm already full. The food is SO good!  I haven't had a single thing which wasn't excellent.  And the prices are more than reasonable. To top it all off, the employees are so sweet. I love going here!
Oh, yummy yummy yum.  Kind of hard to find just by wandering (though I suppose not if I had paid any attention to the street address), but this place is super cute (kind of tiny, so I suppose on some nights of the week it ain't great). The food is delicious.  Their soy chicken is great - has a wonderful texture and good flavor.  I normally hate fake meats, but this was really enjoyable.  In addition to the Kung Pao Chicken, we got the lettuce wraps, which were wonderful.  The jicama added a great texture to the dish and I'd highly recommend them. The service was great.  If anything, slightly overattentive.  We did feel slightly pressured to order an appetizer, which we resisted, but be warned, you'll probably get similar pressure.  They also don't ask you if you want rice, but just provide it and then charge you.  It was a $1.50 a person, so whatever, but they do lose a star for not asking. Overall, wonderful and am looking forward to going back.
This definitely deserves more business than it's getting! It's deeeeelicious.  Try the Basil Tempura and the Scallion pancakes.    I never knew tofu could have that rich a texture, or that you could make a pancake chewy and delicious without animal products.  Well done! A little small, and definitely on the no-frills side.  It can be a little challenging to understand the staff but they're really nice people!  We got a free hot & sour soup of out it.   This isn't a "good vegan place," it's a great restaurant period whose food aboslutely competes with other options around University. Bottom line: Fast, affordable, guilt-free, and yum all over.
Scallion pancakes is a must try.  Great food, great price and great service.  Very friendly staff and food comes out fast.  I'm not a vegeterian, but this is now my favorite restaurant in Downtown Palo Alto.
This place rocks! As a a pescetarian, I miss things like duck and sweet and sour/orange/lemon meat sometimes. Thankfully, this place offers vegetarian-variations of these things. Their duck skin (from their roasted duck dish) was made from Yuba and slightly fried to imitate the crunch you get from roasted duck. Absolutely delicious. Their sweet and sour pork really emulated the qualities of fried pork--it was a bit chewy, a little dry, but drenched in that ruddy sauce that gives it that signature tang and sweetness inherent in almost all sweet and sour dishes. I was surprised and elated to know that there is such a thing as GOOD vegetarian Chinese food! I am soo grateful. Now I have a place to go when I miss Chinese food, albeit Americanized Chinese food to a degree, but it alleviates my craving nonetheless.
This place is really yummy. A big Thank You to Cynthia H. for the heads up on this one! It's a cute and quaint little place right off of University Avenue. The owner lady is a really sweet elderly lady. Okay. She's not THAT old. As soon as we walked in, her radar picked up my Taiwanese mom and they started chatting away as if they were old friends! It was quite a sweet scene. She ran the whole floor and was very attentive to the packed house - carrying her smile and offering her suggestions. My dad, mom, sister and I tried the Veggie Won Ton with Sesame Dressing, Hunan Tofu. General Tso's Chicken, and the Golden Bean Curd Sheet over Spinach (through two different visits). The WonTon dish is a good appetizer for a warm day in Palo Alto. It's fresh WonTon (meaning YES, they are WARM, I was suprised  too), that is mixed in a chilled spicy peanut sauce with shredded carrots. SO GOOD. A little too spicy for me, but I normally can't take spicy, but I continued to eat it b/c it was yummy. To my sister who loves spicy food, it wasn't spicy, but she really liked it too. The Hunan Tofu is Fresh Soft Tofu that is deep fried and sauteed with fresh vegetables like green peas, carrots and peppers with the perfect amount of flavor and it all comes sizzling in its clay pot!! YUM! (I don't like things too salty). General Tso Chicken is deep fried veggie meat that is stir fried in a spicy sweet and sour sauce. I've had better versions of this dish elsewhere, but it's not too bad. Last but not least, my favorite dish woud be the Golden Bean Curd Sheet over Spinach. I call these "Little pockets of goodness." According to my mom, who is also an extraordinary cook, this dish takes SKILLS. The sheet of bean curd that is used to wrap the stir-fried vegetables is extremely thin and smooth. It is tied in a loose knot so that it doesn't break apart at its first bite. This one is a 'Must Try' because not every chef can pull this off. It is a little pricey for the kind of food it is, but I guess it is in Palo Alto, a slightly $$$ area, but I'm still heistant to pay so much for Chinese Food. It's not banquet price, but a little higher than SF price. Other than that...THUMBS UP!
Where to start? The tastiness of the food or the obnoxiousness of the tweed-coated-elbow patched-clownshoes who did not get his pot stickers? Let's start with the food. I had the Kung Pao "chicken", and it was first rate. Poetry on a plate, if you will. The wife and I also braved the dumplings and found them delectable. Everything on the menu looked quite good, and there was an excellent selection of meatless "meat" dishes. The price was reasonable as well, with the total meal running the two of us around $22 bucks. I agree with Louise L., that the spongy texture of the mock chicken allows the soaking up of tasty sauces and spices. Overall, I enjoyed an excellent meal. Service was prompt and friendly. We were greeted like we ate there a lot, even though we had never been there before. As for clownshoes, the place is small. That's why I heard about his pot stickers. And hernia, shoes and crummy lit class. And, like most lit critters and professors, he was a pompous ass. All in all, a small price to pay for an excellent dining experience.
I'm a long time fan of the other Garden Fresh in Mountain View so when I heard about this one I was VERY EXCITED. The thought of being able to walk around beautiful downtown Palo Alto on a nice evening and then stop in at Garden Fresh for some awesome food is just a really really very amazing thought....ACTUALLY it's not only a thought it's reality! The food at this new GF is just as good if not better than the other one. I loved it!! Pros...fully vegan restaurant. No worries about real chicken being deep fried with your veg chicken. Also, friendly staff, love them. Nice location. Awesome tasting food. Brown rice makes me happy. She brought us each soup (like the MV location) even though we didn't order or get charged for it. Cons...I could be totally wrong but I do believe the prices went up. Our Eggplant and tofu dishes were each $9.95. But seeing that the rent is probably way higher at this location, it's kind of understandable. I will definitely be going back. a lot.
As others have mentioned, Alice is the heart and soul of Garden Fresh, and never fails to make you feel welcome and at home. The menu itself is filled with healthy vegan food.  The scallion pancakes, orange chicken, faux honey walnut shrimp-- those are a few of my favorite things. So check it out!  Definitely worth the occasional parking hassle in downtown Palo Alto.
My wife and I are meat eaters but we went with 2 vegetarian friends. I do not see how this restaurant gets such good reviews. China Delight on Emerson gets just a little over 3 stars and is much better. 1. As a solid carnivore I can say that the fake meat dishes are not bad - but not as good as the equivalent dish at most area Chinese restaurants. 2. Both vegetarians did not like the fake meat dishes because they were close enough to tasting like meat that they were grossed out a bit. 3. Meal portion sizes are smaller than other Chinese restaurants nearby. If you want good vegetarian food, why not go to one that enhances vegetable fare without trying to simulate meat?
We love this place! Recommended dishes: Tofu hotpot General's chicken Orange chicken Tofu/corn soup is amazing. We've yet to find something here that we didn't like.
Would give this place 5 stars if I was vegan but I'm not vegan. It's a nice place. Food is alright, people are friendly, not much to complain about.
Love this place.   The reviewers here are spot on.   Even if you are not a vegetarian, you'll love it!
Even though this place was kind of pricey, I really like it.  This is a vegan place that even meat eaters will love.  And just because this place is vegan doesn't mean its healthy- a lot of the dishes are deep fried tofu. We had the scallion pancakes and the basil tempura...the scallion pancakes were AWESOME!!  If the charming old lady (the owner) doesn't suggest them for you then  just trust me and get them! The big draw here is the service- 5 stars.  The owner was there waiting tables and she was so kind and attentive.  It's just that extra friendly touch that makes this place worthwhile to go back to even though it is on the pricer side.
First off, the only reason I'm docking a star is because IT IS SO UTTERLY LOUD inside.  By no fault of the owners/operators, just a small room with poor acoustics and a lot of people. I felt like I was constantly shouting at my friend sitting three feet in front of me; at certain points I got really frustrated that I had to ask her to repeat things three times.  That aside, the food was actually really good! Our original plans of going to Nola's went down the tube when we were told the wait was 90 minutes, so we wound up at Garden Fresh.  Initially skeptical of soy chicken, I became a believer after the Hunan Chicken veggies!  The hunan tofu dish was equally delightful.  Please go and try!
My only advice about this restaurant is to go back again and again.  Virtually everything on the menu is delicious and the flavors and textures are very satisfying.  My personal favorites are the salmon, the fish, and the eggplant.  The service is always very fast and the manager always greets me with a smile!
Thanks for the black pepper chicken and scallion pancakes tips because my first experience was a 2-3. The last time was wonderful
Our comment last time that  "seating is close-packed enough to enjoy conversations from neighboring tables" evolved this time into a "we couldn't wait to leave the cacophony of the gratingly noisy space".  It's a shame and a mystery that an establishment that goes to such lengths in taking care of the health of its patrons and of the earth completely overlooks the noise pollution from its poor sound insulation. This time our meal was 50:50.  A big win with the spicy Kung Pao eggplant and a big loss with inedibly salty faux-ham-wrapped vegetable bundles.  To have captured the smokiness of ham is great, but please leave the saltiness of the curing process behind.
With the kind attention of the owners/cooks in this cozy space, dishes can be hand picked for you... Read more 
I've been grubbing at this place for six years now and I can definitely say it's a great vegan restaurant. It's not as creative and fancy as places in SF, but it's tasty, filling, and reasonably priced. Unfortunately they don't have the Maggie Mud mint chip ice cream any more...I hassle them about this every time I'm in there. The appetizers are all pretty cheap and good, Scallion pancakes are good. The drumsticks are a must if I'm extra hungry. General's Chicken, and Orange beef are my fav's.
A place that makes vegetarian food taste a little like heaven.  I was introduced to Garden Fresh from my good friend Cathy W.  who has been a vegan for decades.  We have tried about half a dozen dishes there and every dish does not disappoint.  Plus they serve brown rice!
my tastebuds are so confused. but happy
I am so glad Garden Fresh opened in Palo Alto.  I work in downtown, and the lunch special is one of the more affordable deals in the area.  Have been visiting the one in Mountain View regularly (the owner, Alice, is super nice) so it's great to see it finally open on Ramona. The food is tasty, Chinese, vegan - what more can I ask for? I ate here 3 days after they opened, and things seemed to be going smoothly.
Seeing this location just opened, I thought I might be the first one to write a review...HA! Nothing but great things to say - such a friendly place, with great food! Let me just preface this by saying, I am a fan of eating healthy, but often times not Vegan because it might sacrifice taste for being good for you... Not at Garden Fresh; it was delicious!! You can actually tell when the ingredients are high quality, fresh, and truly healthy...not just by taste, but how you feel after finishing -- I cleared my plate and felt great! Best Lemon Chicken I have had in a long time. Great food. Great prices. Great staff. Convenient location. Honestly, what more do you want? This is the kind of local restaurant I love supporting...cant wait to go back.
This new restaurant is simply wonderful. Even carnivores like me love it.  The food is fresh, it's really good, and to top it off, it's healthy! I'm not clogging my arteries with my usual intake of tasty lipids. Had the General's Veggie Chicken, and it was great!
This place was so delicious! The tempura basil and the orange chicken were fantastic. I was so excited they had wonton soup...it is a rarity that vegans get such treats. Check this place out if you're eve in the area. They also have black china cupcakes for dessert...YUM!
It's no surprise that Garden Fresh is the highest rated restaurant in Palo Alto. I grew up eating at the Garden Fresh in Mountain View so I was thrilled to see this new location open up earlier this year! I could rave on and on about how amazing the food is and how friendly the staff is, but that would be old news. Instead here are some practical suggestions for some great dishes to try when you visit Garden Fresh: Scallion Pancakes Orange Beef Sweet and Sour Pork Basil Tempura Eggplant and Tofu Coconut Ice Cream
Nice to have a vegan place that also does not use that much oil. The tofu is a bit bland.
The scallions were too good and the service was ok. No complains but the ambience and other stuff we ordered was Meh. The Hunan dish had no taste and the brown rice was over cooked. The mushroom lettuce wrap dish was not bad but nothing to rave about. I wonder if it was because we went really late around 9:30ish when they were wrapping up. Either ways, not a place I will try again.
Liz C. and I are HUGE meat lovers so coming here was purely for healthy reasons and a reason to try something new. Not bad for a vegan place, who knew you could eat healthy with so much flavor? Ordered the scallion pancake, thousand-layer tofu, and veggie duck. The scallion pancake was by far my favorite; it had a sweet sauce on it that made it DELICIOUS. The other two were okay but personally, it wasn't very memorable for me. Good company makes any meal good.
Just had General's Chicken and the Duck Special -- unbelievably good.  The owner/waitress is also super friendly.  A solid 5-star place for a not-so-expensive place!!!
Nice place, with average food at high prices for dinner. The faux meat aspect aside, from a chinese food standpoint there's better chinese food out there with larger portions at a fraction of the price. So I found myself enjoying the meal for what it was and enjoying the novelty of the faux meat but concluding that we probably wouldn't try it again. One dish that didn't really work for any of us was the Grilled Salmon, although I liked the presentation. Given the additional per person rice charge at dinner time, you might consider getting a rice or noodle dish instead since it would be only marginally more I think.
Good food and price
I've gotta say I wasn't thoroughly impressed. Maybe the 4.5 rating set my expectations too high? In my opinion, this food tasted like your average Chinese meal, only the meat isn't actually meat. Maybe it's cool that it is possible to make shrimp and chicken that look like the real deal, but the novelty wears off pretty quickly when you remember you're just eating soy. We got the eggplant dish, which was indeed tasty, but mostly from the syrupy sauce. A clay pot of tofu and shrimp was bubbly and alive when it came out, but in the end was rather bland-tasting. And the noodles with chicken were tasty, but again not much different from any other good chinese noodles. Since I'm not vegetarian, I might as well just eat at a regular Chinese restaurant and enjoy the real deal...But if you're strictly craving veggie Chinese food, all in one meal, this is the place to go.
The orange chicken is amazing!!!!  Best vegan food in the area :)
I'm not a vegetarian, but I really enjoyed this place. IMO it's the 2nd best chinese place you can eat at in downtown palo alto (behind tai pan obviously, and way above china delight and jingjing). Prices are $8-$12 a dish. I ordered veggie ham, black pepper veggie chicken, and scallion pancakes The scallion pancakes are incredibly good. Not sure how they do it, but the texture is very different from most scallion pancakes. It's like $5 for 8 or 10 pieces. Forgot to count. But definitely get this one. Comes glazed w/ a nice sauce. veggie ham was not bad, though I wouldn't order it again. the difference between ham and soy was subtle, but still slightly noticeable. Wasn't a big deal at all though. black pepper veggie chicken was delicious. I kept trying to taste the difference between soy and chicken but I wasn't able to. It pretty much tastes exactly like chicken. I was very shocked. Even if you're not a vegetarian, you should really ignore the fact this place is vegan, and just treat it as any other chinese restaurant. It's impossible to tell the chicken is not chicken... I'm chinese and eat chinese food all the time, and thought both lunch specials were very authentic. They don't use MSG so that's great. Love delicious food that's also healthy. Also, the server was very friendly and we had a nice chat before I left. Definitely would come back again.
Yum
Really great dishes. Service here is ridiculously fast.  This place is great for everyone!
Have been a regular at the mountain view location. Just chanced upon this other location while on the lookout for a good place to eat along university. I was pleasantly surprised that the owner seemed to remember us, even though we could not. We got the spring rolls to start with. From the entrees, we got the general's vegetable chicken, Kung pao veggie chicken and the Hunan chicken. Have not been to very many vegan places, but this is by far the best. I have cut a couple of stars because it is extremely oily and unhealthy. We do request for less oil in our dishes and they accommodate.
I was excited to see that the new restaurant in town is totally vegan, so Si and I thought we'd give it a try. Turns out it's Chinese food... It's kind of ironic that the last time I ate Chinese food was in China... and the experience made me swear off meat. Now, the first Chinese restaurant I eat at since then is VEGAN. THE FOOD: We ordered Spring Rolls, Kun Pao Eggplant, Black Mushroom with Bok Choy, and a side of brown rice. The spring rolls were deliciously crispy and served with a large dish of sweet and sour sauce. We were also served complimentary bowls of a white, creamy soup that was packed full of flavor, and oh so good. The Kun Pao Eggplant was cooked perfectly; brilliantly purple eggplant slices juxtaposed against sharp green basil and covered with a somewhat  spicy Szechuan sauce. We thought the dish could have used a little more spice and red/green bell peppers. When the mushroom dish came out, it didn't look that appetizing, but we were wrong!  The mushrooms were melt-in-your-mouth juicy and tasted amazing with the crunchy bok choy. What a simple, but yummy dish! The entire meal came to $30, which isn't cheap, but it's a fair price for a delicious, healthy meal that promises to leave you feeling stuffed. THE ATMOSPHERE: The place is small, but nicely appointed. The ceiling lights are blown glass fixtures that look like colored clouds floating overhead. There are beautiful black and white photos displayed gallery-style along the walls. And cute bamboo shoots in tiny pots on each table. If I judged on the atmosphere alone, it would be worthy of 3 stars. They did a nice job on a small budget with a small space. THE SERVICE: Wow, the service was lightening fast (one of the benefits of having two servers for a very tiny space). They were very attentive and--most importantly--seem to really enjoy their jobs. Overall, great food, enjoyable experience and I can't believe this food is vegan!  It shows me that I really have a lot to learn about cooking flavorful vegan dishes. This is easily one of my favorite restaurants in Palo Alto now.
I guess once Han's moved down onto University, another place was bound to snap up this spot. I used to go to the Garden Fresh with a number of vegetarian co-workers years ago. This space is up to adte and much nicer than the old, time forgotten strip mall MV locale. Got a Singapore style vermicelli noodles to go. Even as a to go order, the lady working brought me some soup as I waited. Vermicelli is nice and spicy with a great curry style seasoning. I used to eat a lot of those mock tofu style foods growing up so, this cuisine is right down my alley
I've tried this place twice now and have not been pleased with the food.  Maybe I haven't ordered the "right" things, but the flavors have been unpleasant to me, pretty bland or just bad.  The only good part was that I could order anything on the menu and trust that it was meatless.  This is not enough reason to give it a third try.  I will be seeking other vegetarian options.
Had a great experience here yesterday. Food is fantastic and the service here is super friendly. We will certainly be back. This is the kind of food you could eat again and again. The menu is very extensive which is always a real treat if you're a vegetarian/vegan.
We had lunch here on Christmas. We ordered the steamed wontons for appetizer. One word - yum! The waitress brought us tofu and corn soup that tasted absolutely fantastic. For the main course we ordered Kung pao eggplant and Hunan tofu. Both were excellent. The Hunan tofu came in a sizzling clay pot and had vegan chicken strips in it. The restaurant got filled up pretty fast and the chef came out to ask how everything was. I wouldn't say it is pricey for a vegan place. Great service, great food and a casual ambience.  A must try if you are in the area.
Pretty decent food.
You get good karma just by eating here! Alice makes delicious Chinese food without the mystery ingredients mostly found in other Chinese restaurants that serve "vegetarian" dishes. No oyster or fish sauce here and eggs are no where to be found on the menu. Just go there...Happy Buddha  would approve...
the best vegan "fake meat" place that you could possibly eat at. the "sweet and sour pork" had the same taste and texture of real sweet and sour pork. it doesn't have that bouncy soy texture that usually afflicts fake meat. the tofu delight was flavorful and juicy. everything was very saucey. i love the fact that they serve brown rice! portions are a little small though.
Have the orange beef and Mongolian chicken! It was amazing!!!!! The food was wonderful, coustomers were regulars and really friendly and the service was great! I highly recommend it!
Went for lunch and had a nice simple meal that was tasty. It wasn't over the top fancy but it was just right. The waitress was very friendly but was handling the whole restaurant alone. Yes, I'll go back to try some of the other plates that they serve like the orange beef? chicken dishes? really? all vegetarian? Crazy talk ...
2* for atmosphere 4* for the food 4* for the friendly staff
I tried out this place togo.  I was good, but not nearly as tasty as my now closed Fon Yong, in San Carlos.  The food was a little bit blander.  But my favorite item was their drum sticks.  Just like the kind they sell at Tofu Com Chay in San Jose.  It was really hard to find parking around here just for take out, that was a bummer.  The inside of the restaurant was super cute.  The lady was really nice and full of positive energy.  If I'm every down town Palo Alto I'll eat here, but I don't see myself going out of my way from Belmont to get take out again.
A must go! Everything is tasty AND healthy. We started with soup (hot & sour and tofu & corn) and had Hunan Tofu and Tempura Basil for our entrees. Everything was so good we finished it all in 30 minutes with not even a grain on brown rice left on our plates. Vegan and delicious. Also, the service was great! Even though I live in SF, I know I'll be back again and again...
We went back 2 weeks after the first review, with some other friends.  The food was back on par with what I remembered in the Mountain View restaurant.  Perhaps, they just needed some time to settle in to their new digs.  Whatever it was, they are into their groove.  Great food and service.  I'm in love!
I've frequented the MV location many times and was thrilled to find out that PA would expand its... Read more 
Sorry yelpers, you have let me down on this one.  First off, this is not the "real" chinese vegan style food.  Gosh... it's really hard to explain to you cause the true vegan cuisine consists of the same ingredients BUT the way they made it is so different - much more tasty and delicate and should have a lot more variety as well.  Anyway, there are many options nowadays for vegan so I will not be going back.  BTW, they advertise free spring roll or chicken wings for yelpers who spend $30 or more is not true.  I mentioned it to them and was given nothing.  Bottom-line, I can get better quality tofu stir-fry with green peas at many other Chinese restaurants or even at home as a matter of fact.  : (
This place was pretty good. I had the orange beef with broccoli, and it was pretty decent but not as good as the hype made it seem like it would be. The prices were pretty reasonable and the scallion pancakes were good, though I thought they would be more pancake-like than big chip-like. The service was ok. The waitress kept telling us we needed to change what we were getting in order to share better...and she was kind of hard to understand sometimes. Be careful, they only take credit card if your order is more than twenty dollars.
I love this place.  My mom is a Vegan and I'm vegetarian so we love being able to come here and just order anything off the menu without thinking about whats in it.  I really love the scallion pancakes.  The food is flavorful and quite enjoyable.  The lunch deals are very good deals and good size portions.  We try to order something new every time and we have not tried anything we didn't like.
D.E.L.I.C.I.O.U.S!!!  The orange chicken dish is wonderful - my fiance isn't vegan but he enjoyed it thoroughly.
I've also known Alice and Robert for years and I too have followed them from restaurant to restaurant. Alice is one of the sweetest people you will ever meet; she and the servers make the restaurant feel homey and inviting. As a vegetarian, I have always craved well rounded, filling, and healthy food. Garden Fresh takes the cake (although I always simple call it "Alice's"). Those who eat meat will never even notice the difference! The food is so amazingly flavorful, juicy, and well, addictive! MUST TRY! You'll be coming back for more.
I freakin' love this place! The food is so damn, well, garden fresh! It's good, not too greasy or saucy, the faux meats are great, I love the noodle dishes, apps, and unlike a lot of vegan restaurants, they serve beer and wine. A good way to lure non-vegan friends into a drinking/eating/hangout experience. The people are so nice and the decor reminds me more of  a japanese joint. I would give it five stars for less abrasive lighting (silly I know, but it's kinda bright in there!).
i LOVE the new restaurant! i've eaten at the mountain view location for years and absolutely love the food, and i'm so happy the new restaurant is just BEAUTIFUL and closer to my house my favorite things there are the sweet and sour pork (i love this so much more than "real" sweet and sour pork), orange beef (with that FANTASTIC sauce), scallion pancakes, egg rolls, oh and that hot and sour soup is awesome too oh and there's BEER! Yessssss! one little quirk...you have to ask for chopsticks lol service is always super fast and super friendly, prices are reasonable, everything is tasty, wow i'm getting hungry maybe i'll go by there tonight and grab some take-out :)
I've been to basically all of the vegan chinese restaurants in the entire peninsula, and this is definitely the best.  It's cheap, it's really tasty, and the service is awesome.  The owner is the best.  My non-vegan friends ask me to go here all the time, because THEY love it... it's just cheap and extremely good, whether you're vegan or not.  And the chocolate cake is so excellent.  This restaurant is a godsend.  Eat here often!
I made a reservation for 8:20 and arrived past 9pm. They had officially closed but welcomed us heartily. The owner (very sweet woman) showed genuine interest in my wife and I, and was very helpful and caring. It's VERY rare that you get this level of personal interaction with anyone much less the owner of a restaurant. The food was excellent, very affordable, and the environment acceptable. All vegan, amazing desert topped a wonderful dining experience at Garden Fresh. I really couldn't ask for better other than maybe some music being played!
We did not realize it was vegan until we had already sat down and looked at the menu, we decided to stay and give it a shot. The service was good and we thought the food was good also. Three out of four of us got food poisoning. I have only felt that bad a few times in my life. It was miserable.
Basil tempura = good, but way to much sauce. The fake chicken dishes are done well, but the other meats are not that great. It's a nice cosy restaurant with super friendly servers.
I was definitely a bit torn as to how to review this place.  The place is tiny and the service is excellent, but I was completely torn about the food.  We started with the scallion pancake which was great and then i had the veggie curry noodle soup which was only ok.  We also ordered the veggie orange beef which I didnt try and the faux prawns with walnut sauce which was surprisingly good for fake prawns. I guess if I were vegan or vegetarian, I would LOVE this place like a lot of my friends do, but I often just find that fake meats are weird.
Pretty tasty vegan Chinese food! Lots of tofu, soy "chicken" and "pork" fillers with traditional sweet and sour, Hunan, or black bean sauces and all are served with brown rice. Friendly and lightening speed service. Small restaurant with seating for approximately 25 people total.
Love the food! Great service!
This restaurant has really sweet owners that run the place and they serve great food. It is a vegetarian restaurant but they have soo many dishes on the menu that would make you think you were eating meat.  The "chicken" chow mien is AMAZING, some of the best I've had at a vegetarian restaurant, Chinese restaurant or otherwise. Meals like Sweet and sour "pork" (tastes like the real thing), general's "chicken" as well as many others have such good flavors and the magic they work with that tofu would have even the biggest carnivore perplexed.  Also, the egg/spring rolls are super delish. It doesn't look like much on the outside and to be honest if I hadn't been dragged in here by a friend I probably wouldn't have gone....but am sooo glad that I did. See for yourself, give it one try, and I'm sure you'll be a Garden Fresh convert too!
we were deciding over email where to go and as a joke (me being filipino and filipino food is in no way vegan friendly) threw out garden fresh. i was thinking, it'll be a funny joke and there's no way people will go for it. my joke turned into reality. i told my co-worker larry that we were going to a vegan chinese place and he LAUGHED AT ME! in any event. i thought what the hell. why not? i had the black pepper chicken and i swear it tasted and had the texture of chicken. it was unbelievable. we all got different lunch plates and i had my eye on the tofu w/ veggies and the eggplant dish. all were served with brown rice. another co-worker ordered plain veggies that were dry stir fried - all the veggies were really fresh and crisp. at $7.95 a lunch plate, not bad for downtown palo alto! we've already made plans to go again next week.
I don't know what the hype is all about. I've had much better. It gets very crowded at dinner time and there are just a few tables. I found the portion sizes to be pretty small and the sauces were watered down.
Got the veggie beef broccoli, scallions cake, hunan tofu and veggie chow mein. Didn't like that the waitress didn't write down the order and had to come back and ask what we ordered. The food was typical of any chinese restaurant except more expensive because of the vegan marketing. You can get the same stuff by going to a non vegan place and ordering off the vegetables section.
I felt a bit rushed, but they are efficient! I went here on a warm Sunday eve; actually yesterday and it was pretty good! Recommend the egg plant! The singapore curry noodles were good but you can get similar at loving hut. Overall a decent place to get some vegetarian food.
we've been going here for years, always yummy. And vegan is a bonus. The whole menu is creative and interesting. naturally have my favorites: scallion pancakes way at the top of the list, right next to orange beef....
Outstanding food.  The basil tempura is amazing as the morsels tasted exactly like fish.  The first bite is packed with flavor though it can be too much if it's the sole dish you're eating.  Will have to come back more people and try the rest.
I love this place.  The owner is super-friendly, if a bit aggressive in trying to convince you to eat more and not take your leftovers home.  I've never had anything bad here, but the standout dishes in my opinion are scallion pancakes (deep-fried and drizzled with some kind of salty sesame syrup), potstickers (which are made with thick, doughy pasta, not skimpy gyoza-type wrappers), and Singapore noodles (just the right amount of curry and not too greasy).  The Basil Mu Shu rolls are also lovely and very fresh. Overall, I think this is the best vegan-friendly restaurant on the Peninsula.
I got this confused with the other Garden Fresh the first time I wrote the review.
If you have been to China and tried fake meat vegetarian dishes around/in some temples, then you will think this place is really not that great. The food tastes extremely americanized and is about 20% more expensive than what I would have paid for.
it is a okay restaurant. food tastes good, but greasy.. even tho it's veggie restaurant, but the calorie is still pretty high because of the big amount of oil they use. recommend: string beans. not recommend: eggplant ( sucked up all the oil within,, and tasteless.. )
Yes, close to home,Love this place and Alice,will be dining once a week,Please come check it
I love the food here even more than at the original location in Mountain View. Alice is so friendly, it's amazing how well she can juggle so many orders at once. One of the dishes that's new to this location is the    BASIL TEMPURA, and it's divine. A sweet salty and spicy basil sauce over tempura fried mock meat. I also like the prawns and walnuts. Wish the new location was even bigger, because i know once the word gets out, it's going to be hard to get a table at this lovely new location.
Wow. The service was delightful and warm - the food was delicious. As a veggie, you normally stay away from chinese food. Our visit here definetly made us hungry for more.
I haven't "Yelped" in a long time since I am no longer a "fan" of Yelp. However, In fairness to Garden Fresh, I thought that I would give it five stars. I am not a Vegan, but the food here was very good. I love my meat, but I was fine with non-meat food. The owner seemed very friendly and the food was defnitely lighter than traditional Chinese food. I ordered a "chicken" dish which ended up not being "chicken", but the sign clearly says "Vegan" so I was fine. Also, considering that Garden Fresh is located just off University Ave (ie high rent), the prices were excellent. I would like to try more dishes here in the future.
Service fast.  Food ok.
I like this location much better than the one in Mountain View. It seems cleaner & better for dining-in than the Mountain View restaurant.  Here are some of my favorites: -BASIL TEMPURA -scallion pancakes -Crispy tofu with vegetables -tofu skins and asparagus The prices are decent, but too expensive for Chinese take out.  You can get cheap items here, but it all adds up.  You have to pay seperately ($4ish) if you want a small bowl of soup with your meal. Overall, I would still highly recommend Garden Fresh.  Delicious!
I was so excited to find out that Garden Fresh was opening a new branch in downtown Palo Alto. I love the vegetarian goose, vegetable bundles, and corn soup at this place. Also, it is one of the few vegetarian Chinese restaurants in the Bay Area that consistently serves good food, the other being Enjoy Vegetarian in SF. The waitress is super friendly and her regulars always come back.
Garden Fresh is amazing! We got the drumsticks, which are a yummy, "I know this isn't great for me" treat.  We also tried the spicy eggplant (amazing!) generals tofu chicken (awesome!) and the rock-n-roll scallion eggplant. There is just a ton to choose from at Garden Fresh. Its funny to hear people complain that they only have brown rice. We already have our next menu planned out.  I'm stoked that P.A. is becoming a little haven for healthy veggie food.  Perfect date: dinner at Garden Fresh or Loving Hut and an old flick at the Stanford Theatre. Check out Garden Fresh, it totally rocks!
Pretty good for Vegan.  Not the best, but I'd eat here again.  Friendly service and a good menu.
Yummy! Had orange chicken, chow mein, basil tempura, roast veggie chicken, drumsticks and spring rolls. Not by myself, came with a group ;) . Everything was very good. The Basil tempura and drumsticks was my favorites. Friendly service. Will go back soon! Loooove it.Parking can be a problem in busy Palo Alto.
The Orange Chicken was obviously not chicken, but it tasted delicious anyhow. Great service too.
Soooo good.  We had the veggie wontons appetizer, tofu delight, and kun pao eggplant.  All were super good.  We also got some soup on the house that was really good.  Definitely going to go back!
I came here for dinner with my boyfriend a few weeks ago & we loved this place. Since we arrived 30 minutes or so before the closing time, we could get a nice table and we had a great time. But I passed by a few times afterwards and I could see that this place was always crowded! The food is delicious: we are not vegan or vegetarian at all (this was actually my first vegan experience), but we ordered eggplants & veggie ham to share, and this was so flavorful! There is a great atmosphere, simple and "fresh". Also the owner, Alice, is very nice and friendly :)
Just ate there tonight and enjoyed my meal a lot. Not a big fan of the soy-meat products, but everything else was delicious.  If you have ever been skeptical about vegan, come try this place out and then make a real opinion about it. Yummy and healthy..yay!
Garden Fresh Vegan is our new favorite place for Chinese food when we want fast and friendly service with delicious veg meals.  The "duck" was tasty and good texture.  The basil tempura was just spicy enough.  The portions were generous.  Most definitely not just another new restaurant.  We hope they succeed and are around for a long time.
I've been wanting to try this place forever!  Being a pescatarian, I love Vegetarian Restaurants.  So I dragged my boyfriend here for date night.  I thought it was just o-k.  I really wanted to like it because I wanted a good Vegetarian restaurant and the people that work there are soooo nice. The free appetizer was very greasy as if the oil wasn't hot enough, but it was free.  The Hot and Sour soup was ok, but didn't taste very authentic.  The meal was overall ok.  Maybe I didn't order the right things since it seems most people love this place.  Maybe we will try it again.  Wasn't bad, wasn't great, not on the top of my list to return.
Healthy (not-greasy!), fresh, cheap and very tasty!  I don't think I have ever found such a combination at a Chinese restaurant.  I wish a satellite of this restaurant would open in the Mission district, because it would kill.
I've been coming here a lot lately and just trying out different things on their menu but so far I have not fallen in love with anything. Their eggplant dish w brown rice had waaay too much sauce. The mongolian "beef" also had too much sauce. Other than that, the food is good. For now I will keep exploring...
I have taken people here who are not into vegan/vegetarian alternatives to traditional Chinese fare, and they were all pretty surprised. The food here is really good. You MUST give the Basil Tempura a chance. As my fiance said last night, "they must put some crack in this." Hahaha. It's really good! The owner/manager is very good with customer service and sweet. She makes you feel like this is your small-town, every Friday night restaurant. Some of the other waitresses are not as good, but I think since the place is relatively new and small, they are still growing on their service.
Love this new location as much as the original in Mtn. View though this place is newer, sparklier and dangerously closer to my place. Food is fantastic. I can't say which dishes are favorites because I have never had a bad one though Lemon Chicken is up there on the list (along with Sweet and Sour Pork, and Scallion Pancakes and Wontons w/ Sesame Sauce and well, you see where I am headed...) Service is always fast and friendly. Alice is like the Chinese auntie you never had making sure your male companions pony up the cash when the bill comes, telling you to clean your plate, etc. I love this woman! Prices are great for the huge family-style portions. I just wish there weren't so many fried things on the menu because grease is this vegan's vice. I have zero self-control when it comes to eating it! Some things are so meat-like they give me a bit of the creeps but for the meat-eating friends this is the perfect spot to bring them if they have any doubts that vegan food can be satisfying or that ersatz meat these days is eerily close to the real thing.
One of the best vegan asian restaurants I have ever eaten at.  If you haven't tried it you need to check it out and try it.  I have eaten many things off of the menu and everything is good.  I am not a vegan nor a vegetarian and this restaurant is still very good.
I love Chinese flavors, but rarely go to Chinese restaurants because the food just feels too heavy, too oily and dare I say...even greasy.  But friends picked Garden Fresh for a big social dinner one night. What a treasure in downtown Palo Alto!  I could eat here every day.  The flavors are light and bright, the veggies crisp and, well, garden fresh.  The sauces are wonderful, and they do a pretty good job adjusting the fire level.  (Note to those who can't tolerate hot:  you might want to start with mild and then scale up.  I loved the stuff we ordered "medium" but some might consider it spicy.) I pretty much loved everything, but my favorite was the Veggie Ribs-- made of pressed mushrooms-- just awesome.  Service was friendly and fast,  the ambiance simple but enhanced by some cool photography (appears to be a rotating exhibit).  Has that friendly feeling of a family restaurant run by people who love what they are doing. And for Palo Alto, a great meal at a very very reasonable price in a convenient location. I shall return!
this place was delicious! ive eaten at this one and the one in mt. view. very refreshing to eat at a chinese owned vegetarian restaurant. ate: steamed buns (dough was sweeet and meat was tasty and moist), beef and broccoli, orange chicken, hunan chicken and black bean chicken (very non original staples but still tasted hella good. I liked the meat texture) and the place in mt. view gives you free soup as your appetizer.
The vegetarian food here was pretty good, although I am a meat eater and I would prefer to eat meat. All the dishes tasted freshly prepared, and the service was quick. Didn't have to wait too long for the food. I had the "chicken" chow mein, and I thought it was good. I would probably go back to try some of the spicy dishes.
We love the Mt View Garden Fresh and were so happy when they opened in Palo Alto.  The food is amazing, the vegetables in the dishes are always cooked perfectly, never overcooked and mushy.  There is a nice variety of dishes and they have even added some new dishes to the menu which I am excited to try.   They serve many of the dishes you would find in a Chinese food restaurant except all of the meat in the dishes is made with a some type of meat substitute. (soy, shitake mushroom gluten, etc) We have  never had a dish that we didn't love.  It is hard to pick out a favorite dish since they are all really good, although I do love the orange steak, beef with asparagus, and  the sauteed string beans.  My kids love the orange chicken, scallion pancakes, chicken drumsticks and eggplant, but really everything is delicious here.  It is best to get a variety of dishes and have everyone share. They serve Maggie Mudd ice cream, but we rarely get to order it since we are always too full.  Many of the dishes serve 2 people. Alice, the owner, is wonderful,  and after a few times of coming to the restaurant, she will get to know you and your family and always greet you warmly when you come in. Truly the best vegan restaurant around, although you don't have to be vegan to enjoy the food.
I was so excited to hear that this restaurant had finally opened in Palo Alto. I rushed over and only had time to get a small side order of Basil Moo Shu Rolls. But, they were so delicious and fresh that I ordered another set to go before I left the restaurant. The owner came out to talk with me and explained how all of her dishes strive to be healthy and include fresh vegetables. These Moo Shu rolls certainly felt refreshing and good for you . . . and they tasted great, too. I can't wait to go back there for many regular meals. So many of the dishes sound wonderful!
Wow, I don't even know where to begin! This place is freakin' awesome! I actually signed up on yelp only to write this review. The food is fresh and delicious. Somehow it is quick too! Alice came out of the kitchen to check on how everything was. She was super sweet! She made sure we liked the food and were being treated well. Even if you're not a vegetarian you should give it a try. My boyfriend does not consider it a meal unless it has some type of meat and even he enjoyed it very much. Alice told us she buys the vegetables fresh every morning before she comes to work. One of our new favorites in Palo Alto!
This place was great. Had "chicken" that was in a black bean sauce and it seriously tasted like chicken. This place is a bit far from me so I've only been once but had great food and would go back again if I was in the area.
Definitely one of the best vegetarian restaurants I've been to in the U.S. My friend and I got crispy chicken and roasted duck. They both tasted amazing! As a non-vegetarian person, I had a hard time believing that the "meat" dishes we got were actually vegetarian. Service was great! Our server was very good at recommending and suggesting what we should get. Prices are good, too.
We were looking for something different and Yelp lead us here.  Vegans and vegetarians will be thrilled and even if you're not, you'll be happy.  So many wonderful flavors and many options.  We had lemon chicken and the best green beans we have ever had.  There isn't much ambiance but it doesn't matter because the staff is friendly and the food is delicious.
wow, what a wonderful surprise.  the food was so tasty and the orange "chicken" really had me fooled.  i will definitely come back again and bring my friends.
Update:  So, when they charged me for the lettuce wraps, I insisted that I take the dish home, and they gave it to me.  The following day, I tried to eat the dish, thinking maybe it was better then I had thought....but...it was just as disgusting the second day...and I threw it out.  Really gross and so very disappointing...
REALLY BAD experience at a restaurant that is usually one of my favorites.  I have been a regular... Read more 
Medium.  Slightly prefer the taste of the one in Mountain View.
two thumbs up on the Hunan Tofu, so good...will be back soon
Good food. It seems to me that you're cheating if you call yourself a vegetarian but eat imitation meat, but it's okay. I won't tell anyone.
this place either in mountain view or palo alto. the food is fabuloue and the owner of the resturant is very sweet, kind and socialable.
Best vegan chinese food i have EVER consumed!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Let me start by saying I have never written a review for anything online before this, but I was compelled to do so due to absolutely loving my meal at Garden Fresh in Palo Alto tonight. The menu was extensive and based on what I ordered, the best tasting Chinese dishes I've ever had! My husband and I split the wonton soup, spring rolls, sweet and sour chicken and orange beef with broccoli; every bite of each item was so very satisfying! The owner, Alice, came to our table to greet us as she recognized us as first-timers. She was very warm and friendly and enthusiastically explained how each dish was made. The very small restaurant had a plain decor, but as every seat was filled it had a warm, cozy and energetic atmosphere.
Think an overpriced local eatery with basic food and very limited seating. The concept is good but the owners charge way too much. Two basic dish, corn drop soup and $40. Go elsewhere please on University Drive. This while the owner kept looking at our table of 3 and wanting to bump us because the incoming customers needed our table. We prevailed and owner looked elsewhere but come on.
Read recent reviews and went with a list of others recommended favorites.  Loved the Scallion Pancakes with sweet red sauce provided, also the Moo Shu Basil rolls were my favorite. Very light, fresh and tasty. Found the Chow Fun flavorful but too slimy/greasy.  The Egg Plant Tofu dish was also slimy.  Orange Beef was really a strange surprise.  Not what I expected and had the texture and flavor of overcooked sweet potato, although nice flavor in the sauce.  The meal left me wanting for more fresh vegetables and less heavy, oily fare.  I plan on returning to explore the menu once again to see if I can discover more dishes like the Moo Shu rolls. The staff was friendly.  The decor clean and contemporary.
Very disappointed - the imitation is bad. If you want to do vegan do vegan no need for 'meat like'. Tastes were identical. The only good dishes were the basil tampura and eggplant.  Otherwise nothing special can not understand the hype.
acceptable- to good-tasting alternatives to meat.  savory but not too salty or msgy.  crisp tofu was really good.
We visited this place on a Saturday night and it was pretty busy. We ordered the sweet and sour soup, moo shu veggies, orange chicken and the salmon. The soup and moo shu dish were pretty good, the "chicken" was fair, but the "salmon" tasted like 3-day old fish. it's unclear why a vegan restaurant needs to serve fake meat dishes. The service was good.
Finally a vegan place in Palo Alto! I tried it once and really liked it, and it stands on its own versus all the other Chinese restaurants in Palo Alto, vegan or otherwise. It's also a mom and pop restaurant and the owners are very friendly and helpful.
group of 2 ample seating (maybe slow business) ~15$ fake meat manager is friendly food's ok...
Tasty spring rolls, general chicken and Kung Pao chicken. Fast service.
This place is not only my favorite vegetarian restaurant in the Palo Alto area, but also my favorite chinese restaurant. Favorite dishes include the General Tso's Chicken and Orange Steak. And absolutely make sure you get the scallion pancakes!
I am reviewing this restaurant as a regular Chinese restaurant NOT as a vegan Chinese restaurant so I am comparing it against regular chinese food.  In that context I thought the food left me a bit wanting.  The decor is clean and neat, service is great and the food even tasted clean.  But again in pure taste it was only A-OK.  As a vegan Chinese restaurant it's great.  As a regular Chinese restaurant only 3 stars
Best chinese food I have had in a long time!  The tofu was fried to perfection and the owner was one of the nicest ladies I have ever met.  I used my boyfriend's name while I was talking to her at the table and she remembered it 20 minutes later when she brought the bill! I will definitely be coming here regularly!
I highly recommend eating at Garden Fresh. Alice is an absolute sweetie, treats me like family every time I go in. The food is delicious, the decor is nice and since I am vegan I enjoy being able to eat anything on the menu!
not a bad place to eat.  prices are good and service is not bat
